Also, how the fuck did that marine miss with a rocket?
Who said anything about leaving them on your lawn?
Well this is depressing.  I am still working up to a 5k.  I currently run a mile in 12 minutes.  Longest run I did was 3k in 20 minutes.
Fuck Trebek for taking away that other kid's points away because he mispelled it. I always thought the rule was that if you can tell what it is, they'll count it. 
What? No my school has its own bookstore. As far as I know, other places like Barnes and noble don't buy text books.
So did/do you subscribe to the beliefs you were brought up with, or was your choice to get into adult entertainment an act of rebellion in any way?   From what I've seen in this AMA, you seem to break a lot of the stereotypes that are out there about adult entertainers (for the better) so I'm really curious about why you ended up here (not to say there's anything wrong with it!).   Also, did your religious upbringing cause you any internal debate about seeking out this path?
You've been together for only one month. Maybe she's submissive type and just wants to impress you. Or maybe she wants you to be more dominant. How do you interact with her? From what I've read so far sounds like you act submissive/neutral. She's also a human with a brain, you can always ask her.  And since you're doubting if you can continue, especially ask her since you got little to lose.
This is such an underrated game
172, my friend.
[This is why.](http://redd.it/1cjimn) 
Thanks, I'll definitely remember that!
You're probably right, as much as I wish you weren't.
Here's another one 
Just in time. Good one. No conspiracy at all 
The only thing I complain about is people who troll/don't play to win
good point that is true i didnt think of it like that, now that I am it is making it even sadder. Well Im sorry if I brought up bad memories. Thanks for sharing with me
I had some issues with the '72 and ended up trading it out for a Baja Tele: 1. Pickups sounded thin 2.  The big strat head overpowered the lightweight guitar body and made it tend to fall over. 3. Tuning wasn't as reliable as other Mexican Fenders I've gotten.  That could just have been a QA problem though.  That said, it's a beautiful guitar and some hardware changes could be all it needs.
[This article will provide you with some more insight.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Messiah_ben_Joseph)  TL;DR There are two "Messiahs", though the more well known one which you refer to (and Jesus supposedly is) isn't supposed to die before fulfilling them.
Not necessarily lazy. There could be other reasons why I don't bake the cake. Someone else could be planning to do so already, I might decide it's against what's objectively the best thing for me to do, or I might have other more important things to do. Lazy is just one possible solution of many.  Plus, we were supposedly created in God's image. I know a lot more lazy people than go-getters. 
What's your problem, then?
Fuck 'em, feed 'em fishheads.
Nice turtle!
"Okay enough.  I'm not going to be able to think c-clearly, but I can function."
Remember, if it's free to play they are insulated from any complaints, because again it's not a product that they're offering because you didn't buy it -eye roll-
My due date is jan 25, 2014.  I don't really have a preference on the date, but I would rather the LO come in January rather than February.  I've never like the word February ! Lol and I can't spell it. Thanks iphone autocorrect!
So...basically a population density map?
It's not as brave as you think. Tunisia has a large number of cultural Muslims. It has had a youth revolution over the past few years. It's still a little brave, because the guy wants them charged, but about as brave as a photo radar ticket.
it looks shinier, like the difference you can see on the filters of primetime tv against soaps from the afternoon, but calm down on that contrast!
I just want a solid black or even navy backpack that doesn't cost $325 :(
Plex uses FFMPEG as the transcoding core. It does however have device profiles that let it do smart things like change container types if the streams are the correct codec, or only transcode the audio if the device supports the video. A dual core CPU is still a must for the server.
ITT: People lost it.
What?
&gt; I dont agree with you but I see your point. Like this other guy said though what I was really getting at was if you cant do this then you have absolutely zero critical thinking skills.   People react differently to different technologies. I am pretty clueless when it comes to cars. I can figure out how to fill them with gas or windshield wiper fluid but even now I still need someone's help when changing a flat, and I don't think I could ever figure out how to change my oil unless someone actually showed me.
Exactly like how the choice at the end of Far Cry 3 felt. I wish they just chose a solid ending themselves.
I go auu when someone gets a legendary courier while I got a box
Yes. He wants to make teh secks with you in a friendly friendship kind of way.   Just FYI 
6:12  7:00  7:35  8:22  Thanks for the contest!
Awesome! I think it may be the former. 
Perfect.
Is soad going on tour around the U.S. any time soon?
This one's the first one guys. It'll fill up quickly. I'll post a mega-post about all the leagues soon, ideally after this one fills up.
  Living in Australia, this makes me sad :(, although I suppose it could be a cheap deal to New Zealand.   &amp;#12494;( &amp;#94;_&amp;#94;&amp;#12494;)   --------------------   Let me fix that for you (automated comment unflipper) [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/FIXES_YOUR_COMMENT/wiki)
This is why people photocopy their redbox rentals, cut out the cd sized paper, and return that instead.
That's what she said.
When you clean up after him, throw what he misses in bag and put it in his room, cockroaches are a bonus. I'd boot him out if he can't do his part, it is not just aesthetics but for health reasons. Sounds like dude has some entitlement issues, no matter how nice he is, he has to cooperate with his housemates.
For me it's between Battlefield 4 and Watchdogs.
Sorry for your loss I know what you feel like :)  1. I love going to my Grandmothers ( Nans ) because i always get spoilt rotten and get treated to everything :D  2. I love how my Nan tries to be modern but just doesn't get it :D. She takes about ten minutes to send a text so she just hands the phone to me without hesitation and tells me what to say :D  p.s , I call my grandmother my Nan :)
Sorry, I don't think I understand. Are you saying there is something 'chaining' or 'enslaving' about e-sex?
We've Pearced their defenses!
Ahh. I see now. Learn something new every day. Gonna definitely start better paying attention from now on.
Your gunner went to the dead zone bro. THE DEAD ZONE.
Unfortunately, your submission has been removed for the following reason: Videos have been banned from the network. More information regarding this change can be found [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/PornOverlords/comments/nz6jx/videos_are_now_banned_from_the_network_the_vote/). In the meantime, you can probably submit it [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/VideoPorn), but pay attention to the rules in the sidebar. They are slightly different.  *[I am a bot](/r/PornOverlords/wiki/PornOverlord-info/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fcarporn) if you have any questions or concerns.*
A little on the small side for someone of OP's stature.
India army still uses them now, and the Indian police, and the old kick start ones not new fancy ones with electric start
Haha no. Just meant cooking in general. Rice burns on the stove :)
So much glitter!
Silly rednecks downplaying this. Get over it people. There are many Spanish channels not just one as you people claim.
You use rubber? Hobo-tier at best.
How much of a performance drop would the ASRock 970 Extreme3 give me? 99$ is just barely out of my budget.
I'm still here. Post soon, I really wanna know what's in those other chests.
Except when they charge you double when you didn't even give them the time; what phonies! 
That looked like fun :)
Is the video being unavailable the joke
Agreed!!   And WiiU! I don't like gaming on my PC.  I use a work desktop at work and only have an iPad at home.  I'm all console gaming.  
"Opium suppositories. Ideal for your purposes. Slow release. Bring you down gradual. Custom fucking designed for your needs"
Lol Idk whats going on right now. Whats going to happen that I have to prepare my inbox? Was it the "wet" part or the "embarrassed part?"
Aww, thank you so much! You should definitely step up. And, you're welcome, thanks for taking time out of your day to say something like this.
How do you know so many people out of country?
Wasn't he tasered after being shot?
Chance. I have been spreading your name/music to all of my friends across the country. They love it.  I just wanted to ask, how much has your life changed since 10Day dropped?
Nothing he or his ilk say is constructive.  It gets boring.
My advice is handle a bunch of them, preferably shoot several different ones too, and get whatever you like in 9mm, .40 or .45 from a good maker like Glock, Ruger, S&amp;W, Sig, etc.  Google the make and model before you buy and double check that it has a good rep.
Look Kanye, if you don't get it...
nice scam dude
Practice Like you Play
But we do have elf in UK - http://eyeslipsface.co.uk/ and they have. 60% sale on right now :)
It sort of depends on how we want to do it; lyrics first would make for a strong start, but I've actually been considering another approach.  What if the music evolved as the story did? It would be kind of cool to do a song where the form was more of a story-esque arc that started off in one place and then went from there - less of an AABAAB form, and more of a musical journey, somehow.   Some songs by Tenacious D does something similar to what I have in mind; specifically songs like Kielbasa and Tribute, songs that never quite return to their starting points.  Thoughts?
Your flicker album is incredible. Are [these all originals](http://www.flickr.com/photos/xclearmindx/with/8427135534/)? I'm totally jealous of your travels.
"Stuck in the Middle with You" during Boondock Saints. 
WHOA. This is like seeing a double rainbow or something. 
After watching this trailer I'm still pretty confused what this movie is about, although I feel like that's a good thing. 
At least Florida has a team still.
Did you see the trailer for next year? They look a lot more realistic.
I think she's really not popular enough to warrant enough skin. I'd imagine that skins aren't something you're really going to force, that leads to bad art. Or at least I'd imagine it does. I'm talking out of my ass on the latter but the former is definitely a good point.
Stay hydrated for extra innings? Poland Spring?
He should be hanged, but this is far better than paid administrative leave.
I did this in high school.  Oh. You got patron.  You are so thoughtful.  Let us drink and sexy time.   But no. Herradura. 
You could do with a sandwich less. It saw that!
Shit, that thing looks mean as fuck. 
Because the will to survive, no matter how nonsensical is ingrained in all of us. Most people can easily decide to kill themselves in this event when they haven't been through the event. When your actually there, when its actually a reality, not a thought passing through you over the internet for a few minutes, it becomes difficult to make a permanent decision to end all consciousness as you know it and forever remove yourself from the ones you love for all eternity.
I... I don't know the answer for that... What show? 
I currently keep my brushes in a really pretty candle jar I got from Hobby Lobby with potpourri in the bottom. It makes my brushes smell divine but gets messy occasionally. I'm thinking of switching to beads or marbles or something, though. As far as sanitation goes, as long as you regularly clean your brushes I don't think dirtiness would be an issue. 
What's this whole captcha thing we're doing now?
Thanks
Some guy being an asshole to me on Facebook is how I realized there is no god.
cent cinquante neuf 
Y además: [Homicidios en México, equivalentes a toda Europa en un año: IMCO ]( http://www.vanguardia.com.mx/homicidiosenmexicoequivalentesatodaeuropaenunanoimco-1798431.html)
simply, wow ;)
Thank you for that!  Everyone encouragement at some point.  [I applaud you!](http://25.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_mcz617rSy01r38j04o1_500.gif)
It took all my self control to not put my moms epitaph as "she was a terrible person" but at least I made sure the obituary didn't lie. In summary, mom's obituary read "Elizabitch Fucknuts of NY died. She is survived by blahblahblah." My gran gave a long speech at the funeral saying she didn't think mommy dearest went to hell and now that she's gone we all have peace. It was hysterical. 
let me cum on your nylon feet while you finish
*smiles and gets in*
A bold move, Cotton.
It's a great radio. But as far as tools go knipex. My pliers are amazing. $60 each seems outrageous but once you own a pair you will feel like craftsman, ridgid, channel lock, etc are all worthless cheap junk. 
Mos disturbing? Zerms4 pls. Regards, dolan.
You can appreciate art A and not care for art B and still have your opinion be valid for both.  It seems pretty stupid for you to discard the validity of someone else's opinion because they don't agree with yours.
SWIPER NO SWIPING
LOL
No idea.... I have never heard of this before, but it made me chuckle. :)
I have felt that exact same way with my LDR many times. I can't stand not being with him every day and I cannot wait for our end date in December/January but I would rather miss him and hurt because of it than to not have it at all.
Grew up playing baseball, I use the throwing techniques I learned to play fetch with my cat.
Ya he's a lame. But he's one ripped dude. 
44
I'd say its second only to ME in terms of breadth. And we, as humans, are only just beginnning to realize the potential of the mryiad applications of electricity. You're in good shape.
I just bought a Stanley block plane on clearance for $30. After a couple hours of lapping the bottom and sharpening the blade to a high angle, it is the most useful tool in my shop. What is sandpaper good for, you ask? Round edges only. Flat things get planed.
Female and doesn't appeal to me Iam mire than happy with my s o sexually
That's absolutely true. Just look at the squad idea. During S2 Nightwing organized the entire team into separate squads which was never addressed in season one. While there were obviously more members in S2, their teams consisted of as few as two (Happy New Year, Batgirl and Wondergirl were a full squad that attempted to take down Lobo).  Edit: Spoiler tag didn't work...
There was an article with a Native American group, and they were saying how offensive so many sport logos were, and they used the Blackhawks as an example of a team working with groups to ensure they didn't offend.   ETA: Not the original article I read but something's better than nothing. [Hawks developing ties to Native Americans](http://articles.chicagotribune.com/2011-11-12/sports/ct-spt-1113-blackhawks-chicago--20111113_1_iconic-indian-head-logo-statue-black-hawks)
All they did was ban the worship of Talos. Dragonborn kills innocent people and he has songs written after him.
At least the Giants will know where some of us were coming from when we thought he was damn annoying (especially since he'll be on a rival's team). Love him when he's yours, annoyed when he isn't.
I was most interested when we were following the black-haired woom sailor. I like your use of vernacular in her dialogue. Small note though: I think it should be 'tis rather than tis': It's a contraction of it is, and we've dropped the first i instead of the second.  I'm afraid the second paragraph confused me and I could not follow what was going on. Maybe because I was trying to acclimatise to the 3rd-person present, but upon a re-read I'm still lost.  I also noticed that here and there you slipped into 3rd-person past, which was a bit jarring.   It was the third paragraph that got me to carry on reading. It reads quite naturally, and I am fond of a narrator who self-corrects.
Amazing, I wish i could design this well.
If I lived in a place like that I'd probably rarely play video games.
West Virginia
I go back super early for RA stuff!
The dollar sign actually goes *before* the amount, not after.  (Note that some Frenchies in Canada do not follow the same convention as the rest of the world. If you are a French Canadian, please do not bother replying to this auto-generated message.)
That tower does look pretty awesome!
Whenever you are tempted you should just take a step back and think about your goal. Ask yourself if this will help bring you closer to your goal. If it doesn't then just think about how your body will transform over time because you're avoiding the things you're not supposed to be eating. 
My mom was  smoking a cigarette on the street one day. She was staying at a fancy hotel downtown, couldn't find a bench that wasn't covered in ice (it's winter in Wisconsin). So she decided to stoop down by the building. Some couple tried to give her a dollar, she was REALLY offended. To be fair she has this coat she was wearing that she loves because she found it on sale and us so warm. It's thick wool, long and kind of a grungy green. Any ways she was sooo upset. A real blow to her confidence. If she weren't such a sweet polite woman she would probably have told then to fuck off. End of story: she kept the dollar. 
blow poison mist in the center of the door that has the chaos bugs. if you see a damage meter ticking away, congrats, you have succeeded. There is only one there at that location and it is always the sunlight maggot. I am on NG7 and I use solaire for ever gwyn. It has yet to fail.
&gt;and it usually is up when the sun is down (not always I know).   Keep in mind the *phases* of the Moon, too.  How often are you looking at a full Moon?  It's far, far better to use satellites in closer orbit about the Earth.
but 0-1 with RISP
I literally just did this. You'll be fine with just a passport. I would suggest you get one of the newer models. I paid about $20 USD a day for mine as the others are older and if you're new to riding one, might not be a good idea.  That being said, Taiwan is wildly different from the U.S. as far as driving goes. If you've never ridden a motorcycle either, I'm not sure I would recommend it. IF you do decide to rent one, I would take an extra day just to drive around on flat lat first, before heading to the gorge. 
It's funny though, apple fan boys keep changing the goal posts. When they had more apps downloaded , that shit mattered, and was a point of pride. Now android are a bit ahead, suddenly it doesn't matter anymore, revenue is the true measure of success...   edit- 'TheCodexx' I didn't rip off your post, I just saw it, I just share the opinion.
For the Brotherhood they really should have renamed the Faction for Fallout 3. I think the vast majority of the people that played Fallout 3 didn't know anything about Fallout before that, so they could have just had Lyons change the name to Brotherhood of Iron (hopefully something more creative than that). Then had the "outcasts" just call themselves the Brotherhood of steel. Keep the painted armor though, it looks awesome. 
Haha, me too actually! Although I would love to, I don't have any actual plans of walking it though :0( 
Like when I crossed the Belgian-Dutch border to buy shrooms?
561 right now!   Name's Becca! 4914-3542-7275, will open at 6 PM PST.
KENDRICK WITH A PITCH &gt;:(  BUT DON'T WORRY, HE IS ON MY LIST!
I understand what you are saying.  But, I wouldn't mind adding this to my collection if done well.
This is the first movement of Mozart's Symphony # 40 :)
The greatest headphones you can buy without getting studio quality headphones are $19.95 US and made by [skullcandy.](http://www.skullcandy.com/shop/ink-d-blue-black-mic)  Trust me, you wont find a better sounding ear bud from anyone else.  
Yum! I was actually going to say Creme brulee before I also thought about Chocolate &amp; mint ice cream! Fiction character...does that include superheroes and cartoon characters?! If so, I'd say Squidward Tentacles (from spongebob) because he's always grumpy and funny! :D  How about you?!
Agreed - my point is that it's tough for people who don't know the facts to make a very good guess about the outcome, because the missing facts are the critical ones. 
Correct. For it to be a mental disorder, it must effect you negatively psychologically. **Example:** You don't need to purge to be bulimic, you just need to overeat habitually and feel guilty about it. So two people can have the same exact unhealthy overeating pattern but it's only bulimia if they feel guilty. If one of them doesn't care, then they aren't bulimic, they just make poor eating decisions.
Heh, but at least you didn't stay up to watch the Yankees lose a walk-off..wait, that probably would have made your life better?  DAMNIT.
No, I mean what makes supporting that flag racist when you haven't mentioned racist policies the Japanese government carried out under that flag?
"WHAT IS THY WISH?"
I come here to see  1. confused outsiders   2. perspectives outside /r/mindcrack   3. it has a picture of cats eating popcorn
The joke is how I want it to be.
http://www.twitch.tv/soe  Sony Online Entertainment playing **EverQuest Next** ***(Working Title)***
Q is an isomorphism, so rank QC = dim(im QC) = dim(Q(im C)) = dim(im C) = rank C.
double dildo!
Fuck yes! Semper Fi brother. See you at TBS.
&gt; [8]  FTFY
His popularity all the sudden is because he can farm items faster then any other carry (except am/gyro/luna) and hes tanky as fuck.  If you aggro trilane vs him hes useful, he can support or mid as well its the versatility of the hero that has him (much like gyro) popular.
&gt;This would, in effect, increase a longstanding 1 in 10,000 person cancer rate to a rate of 1 in 23 persons exposed over a 30-year period;  Where are they getting the 1 in 10,000 over 30yrs???  [The age-adjusted incidence rate was 463.0 per 100,000 men and women per year.](http://seer.cancer.gov/statfacts/html/all.html)  Which would work out to 1 in 7.2 over a 30 year period.
You're literally just copying and pasting the exact same two comments to anything at all related to Portland or Oregon. Dude, what do you have against Portland? You've only listed a few stereotypes instead of listing reasons why Portland is a bad city. All of these stereotypes can be applied to any city. I'd bet that most of your upvotes are from people who've never even been to Portland.
I'm currently taking some time off while my son is little, so my website is actually on hold right now. I do have an older portfolio up on Coroflot. It's not up-to-date so please forgive me. It's crazy with a baby. haha! I'm a very corporate designer, not as artistic as your style. But I enjoy the corporate, clean feel. It's just my thing. :)
First questions:   How many hours a day/week do you log on average?   Do you still find runescape enjoyable on the whole?   Do you get tired of your fame sometimes?  What do you do in real life?  Thanks a bunch man!
Reverse Psychology ?
Throw that chicken in some boiling water an you got a stew going!
Ammonite and megacero skull for 20k each.
If girl should be sweet Caroline. 
I'm pretty sure it would be the solvent
And not a single fuck was given. What an awesome rig!
There is nothing wrong with yi, its just that players dont know how to react to him specially in silver and bronze divisions..
watch the newest Steam Train
This was a great read, thanks for sharing!
How are you supposed to have enough diplomats to do that during the first session?
I'm working at GNB too.
Isn't it "big hitter, long." Ect.....?
I completely agree that floppy dew claws should be removed. They can easily get caught on branches, fences, or cut off/nicked while being groomed. They serve NO purpose since there is no bone or cartilage connecting them to the body.
i meant price of the weed mainly not the shipping, 20 dollars sounds fine. Do you know what the strain is named? I would definately order if you could ship internationally
DAE 1860 CHILD?
I love this! I may make it my own if you don't mind?!
Don't tell the IGN guy that reviewed The Last of Us that, he spent half his review going on about how Naughty Dog were clearly heavily influenced by The Road. This was his opening line "The Last of Us is a near-perfect analog for The Road, a literary masterpiece written by Cormac McCarthy."
Well, i'm never using one of those ever again...
That movie is perfect as much as I am a fan of milla naked any more would have just been to distracting. 
Yeah, the engineer who runs this uses pistols because of the skins he has for them (Aetherized recently), but almost never has his base weapons out, so the only reason to dual wield is for two sigils.  He's a key part of our guild's dungeon team, we've gotten through almost the entire roster of paths available - he also runs WvW a lot, so this is viable pretty much anywhere.
ahem... "ELI5 is not for literal five-year-olds."
I think it's safe to say that it's no longer canon at DC. It would conflict with a lot of things in New 52.  It's probably still canon at Marvel, but I doubt they care enough to ever mention it again. Sort of like IDW's Transformers crossing over with New Avengers a few years ago, which was still canon last I checked.
I don't know much about iPhone specs but my Samsung Galaxy S2 could emulate N64 perfectly as far as I could tell, and didnt get hot at all doing so. I used it for that purpose all the time. (before it found its way into a toilet. Fuck you water.)  It could also run dungeon defenders, and that's a pretty demanding game. So, going from that information, it was within the realms of possibility that it could emulate a wii, which I know doesn't have that much power behind it. Obviously more power than a phone, but I assumed the phone would just run the game really badly and get really hot. And then I realised he couldn't possibly be emulating them because Borderlands 2.  edit: apparently samsung galaxy s2 is dual core with 1.2GHz clock speed, wii is 729MHz, though with a GPU as well at 243MHz. iphone 4s @ 800MHz.
I thought you were my only competition though?
I wouldn't worry about him 'not being used' to the new guitar. I've played tons of guitars and can easily transition between them.
Ur, then why are you asking me about unwilling sexual contacts when I'm talking about willing sexual contact?  &gt;you can be assumed to not ever be fully able to consent.  Absolutely.  The report noted (and I quoted) that *all* sexual contact between prisoners and guards is illegal and viewed as staff misconduct for that very reason.   However, I'm talking about willing vs unwilling sexual contact, which is an important distinction despite the fact that no legal consent can actually be given.  Would you deny that a a 17 year old kid who wants to and willingly has sex with his 25 year old teacher would be much less traumatized than a 17 year old who was forced to have sex with his 25 year old teacher?  Both cases are very illegal, but the distinction is important for the minors.  The survey questions very clearly lay out descriptions of unwilling sexual contact through threat, intimidation, coercion and bribes.  Do you think that the inmates are unable to distinguish between unwilling and willing sexual contact?  &gt;Was that not obvious?  It was somewhat muddled by the fact that I had already acknowledged that all sexual contact between inmates and guards is illegal, and thus you were taking swipes at air.  I tried to clear up the comment in case you actually had a valid point I hadn't already made.
I'd appreciate a serious question to this. I think it might just be a depiction of how they have a server in every possible timezone (though I don't see why that's a plus worth calling out...)
I too love space!  I hope that before I die, humans will have made peaceful contact with some form of alien civilization.  As for the telescope, I haven't heard of it before, but I'll be reading up on that now!
[I did LSD too!](http://www.reddit.com/r/SpaceBuckets/comments/1hfq55/lsd_from_seed_to_harvest_105_days_90_pics_with/), thats the complete from-seed-to-harvest album. Loved that plant, awesome smell and taste. Might try it again with much more veg time (only did 20 days with the last).
Cada quien tiene sus razones, pero personalmente yo no me iria por la pasividad. Eso existe en muchos países. Las razones por la que la gente se va de aqui es la disminución de la calidad de vida y el crecimiento de la inseguridad, que atenta contra las libertades personales.  Es muy facil decir que en Egipto se mataron por sacar a Morsi y a Mubarak, pero se les olvida que Mubarak estuvo **40 años** en el poder. Eso es ser pasivo.  En Brazil protestaron por un rato y luego que se acabo la copa confederaciones que? Sinceramente, en mi opinion, Rouseff controlo muy bien la crisis y hablo con los sindicatos para llegar a nuevos acuerdos (aqui Maduro deberia aprender de ella, que cuando no te quieren te tienes que abrir al dialogo, no ser beligerante).  Podría seguir dándote ejemplos, pero no es necesario creo yo.
I only wish he had landed one of those double legs. Still awesome though.
As an Irishman and a cyclist, I'm ashamed of this man. 
I currently own 3:  A very entry level Fuji which was put into the dryer by accident by my wife and is now too small I also own another entry level Gi by Submission Fight Co and I liked it so much I bought another: http://www.martialartssupplies.com/subfc-blue.html
Ugh. The acting in that commercial is just so cringe worthy.
There's been a few AMAs done by car salesman that you should look up. They were very good and helped me when I was making a purchase. 
There used to be a train line that went around a good part of Oahu, out to Haleiwa, etc. 
You are walking on a slippery slope. That kind of reasoning could lead so some truly horrific outcomes.
Hey, thanks but i've already seen The raid. :)
My first two matches I was definitely nervous, id say maybe 5 or 6 out of 10.  I had a lot of things running through my head.  By my 3rd and 4th tournament, it wasnt as bad, when I realized I was going to step on the mat yeah I got a little nervous, but im feeling a lot more comfortable now.  Its definitely ok to be nervous, and something that may be impossible to avoid all together.  But just look at the match as an extended part of your training and nothing more, sometimes that really helps.
Will xbox live gold cost more than the one on 360?
Or anyone good on the O-line either.
ashe has two slows, you have to specify which one next time
She actually says be, not do, but i guess it can still be twisted to work
I love the faces characters make when things happen! That was a little vague but what I mean is that there's this and there's the S01E01 Fry face that was on the sub recently which was great
IMO there is nothing wrong with weed. if you have self control you don't have to do it with her. I'm not really sure what the problem is.   Also, if you really like her, and you found out she smokes pot, does that make her any different?
Some variant of the M4 assault rifle
Why do you sony people always have to do this. *always*
That is so awesome!  Here's hoping they expand some of that technology so when it's my turn for a hysterectomy (all genetic signs point to getting one) they can do something nice and easy like this.
This would work better as:  &gt;I'll get you up if you want.
They're just overpriced, about double the cost of comparable sets, and the sound you get from them can be easily duplicated by just adjusting your equalizer.
I believe this is a red-tailed hawk. I think there's a mated pair on the clock tower and a couple more on/around the medical campus.
A long legged pissed off Puerto Rican stole my lawnmower! Bitch!
I assume he needed to make that clear since this subreddit can be plagued by echoes. Basically, reinforcing that it's okay to be shallow but I get why you would be annoyed by the addition. 
Lions v GB as someone who lives in MI
The ironic thing too is that I can pick up 3G at my house, and its way faster than the broadband. 
We don't have unqualified minimum income, I guess I could have been more specific. Again, not saying that's necessarily what I support, just that there are more ideas on the table than minimum wage.
more resources available to treat other health problems
Unlucky man, unlucky :/
the Mona Lisa is only famous because it went missing.  Most other paintings in that room alone are more valuable and more historically relevant than the Mona Lisa.
"finally let me" lol. woopaa  Build looks good. I got scared at first when I saw the "little" tv there with all that black around it and thought it was overkill. Then the screen came. Well done sir. Looks good. 
I probably could do that if I have the carbon still around, I had cut pieces just sitting around. 
I responded in an edit on my op.
That's called cat-facing. In my experience it is most often the result of cold weather, but here is more info via U Mass Amherst: &gt;Cat-facing is a physiological disorder of tomatoes. Cat-face originates in the early stages of flower bud development and is the result of abnormal development of plant tissue between the style and ovary which results in misshapen fruit. Other impediments to flower bud development can also result in cat-facing. The syndrome is related to unfavorable growing conditions, in particular several days below 60 F when the plants are young. High levels of soil nitrogen and excessive pruning aggravate the problem. Accidental exposure to phenoxy herbicides can also lead to malformed fruit. Cat face is more prevalent on large-fruited, fresh market tomato varieties. Good growing practices, especially temperature control, should be followed in greenhouse production of field transplants. Excess nitrogen, aggressive pruning, and accidental exposure to hormonal herbicides should be avoided.&gt;[source](http://extension.umass.edu/vegetable/diseases/tomato-cat-facing)
But Midnight...
smeevil + tb
On the contrary, I think the shirt is fine. It's just to long. What I don't think works is the pants. Try a darker color of pants.
Or perhaps that they're actually mature minded and are thinking towards reformation instead of punishment?   Essentially sending someone to "prison" doesn't rehabilitate them, they're forced into an environment where they're up against even worse examples of the crimes they're guilty of and they end up being much more horrible than they were before. Once they get out they're still the same person and end up in the same routine as they were before they ended up in jail.   Reformation and rehabilitation is the idea that you provide prisoners with the tools for their own liberation, that given a skill set and ethic that allows them to function without resorting to crime they can provide for themselves a lifestyle which will be much more effective in preventing them from being repeat offenders.  &gt;My reaction to that? The fact that they ruled out the prisoners' island as a solution says to me that they don't have the balls to actually solve the problem of toxic online communities because they're too optimistic and have too much faith in the good in people because they think the other person is too shit to treat like a normal person and deserving of toxicity.  The funny thing is this is the sort of mindset of the people I imagine that are toxic in online games, they aim to "punish" others through suffering rather than trying to work together towards a better goal.
&gt; "1. Their system is closed."  Yep. That's their philosophy. Why?.. because controlling EVERY aspect entirely END-to-END means they can ensure tight integration and reliability. Example:... When you wipe the hard drive on a Mac and reinstall the OS... YOU'RE DONE. You don't have to hunt for Drivers. You don't have to worry that some component won't work. It's all tightly integrated and built into the OS. DONE. Awesome.   &gt; "Software and hardware are hard to work around on all devices."  Not sure what you mean by this. Apple devices work well with other Apple devices. The end-to-end integration makes it all work seamlessly together. That's the beauty of it.   &gt; "2. Their products are overpriced. I know that a lot goes into the design work, but the manufacturing process is quite cheap. Their profit margins per unit sold are incredible."  Guess it all depends on what you (personally) value. I've had many Apple products over the past 5+ years and they are all still working beautifully. Performance, Dependability and beautiful hardware. Worth every penny.   &gt; "3. It costs more to repair a product than to get a new one."  If it's under warranty.. it costs you nothing. If it's NOT under warranty, you take it to an Apple Store and get a quote. Pretty straightforward. I've worked in the PC/Windows Support business for about 20 years.. and I'd rather deal with Apple repairs any day of the week than fight DELL or Microsoft or HP or Toshiba,etc. Nightmares, ugh.   &gt; "4. It's very, very easy for Apple products to break."  Not sure why you think this. I've got a 2007 Mac Mini that's still running strong. Still got my original iPhone 3G running great. iPhone4 still running great. 2007 Macbook still running great. If you take care of your equipment (no matter what brand it is).. it works great.   &gt; "5. The manufacturing process doesn't benefit Americans at all, neither is it ethical to work the way Apple factory jobs work."  Which is true of EVERY technology manufacturer who outsources to China,etc. Why single out Apple ?...   &gt; "6. Apple is putting nothing back into the community."  They make great products that have historically been aimed mostly at Education and Home.... What's not to like about that ?...   &gt; "7. Apple isn't as innovative as the hype says."  Throughout Apple's entire history they've done things differently than the typical generic white-box PC. How is that NOT "innovative" ?....   &gt; "The iPhone was the only thing since vintage Apple, and the first was an unfinished product. Flaws galore."  You do realize that Apple's design philosophy is to "start simple" and iterate &amp; refine to improve the product,... right?... (opposite of approaches like Microsoft that tries to launch a product with 300 features that don't reliably work)  &gt; "8. Apple rejects innovations from its community to put out its own stuff first, even if it isn't as good. eg. The Google Maps fiasco a while ago."  I'm not even sure what this means. What "Google Maps fiasco" are you talking about?... When they changed from Google Maps to Apple Maps?.. that was a fiasco?.. Wow.. you have low standards for the definition of "fiasco".   &gt; "9. The hype and rumors are unprecedented."  That's the media's fault.. not Apples.   &gt; "10. Apple is a tech monopoly."  Apple still only has about 15% of the market. I don't think that qualifies as a "monopoly". 
Honestly? I really like the music in Tear of Vermillion.
Such a trouble maker.
What's it like hanging/performing with Earl Sweatshirt?
Can someone explain the SABRE in layman's terms?  ...or if you prefer, ELI5. Thanks!
I do need to debate that... I originally had a 19" screen, upgraded to 27", was faulty and now have 24". The difference in gaming experience is very noticeable in those different screen sizes.
Not the right reddit, but: God, I hate this crap.
*you're
They have to do things like this so when they try more serious tactics people can't say "They never even tried to do such and such."
&gt;&gt; Pregnancy is - statistically - very safe  &gt; No, it's not at all. Especially not in the 3rd world... due to VERY high maternal death rates.   Ok, let's do the maths: [according to the WHO](http://www.who.int/mediacentre/factsheets/fs348/en/), 800 women a day die from pregnancy or childbirth-related complications.  That works out at 292,000 per year.  The [world birth rate](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Birth_rate) is 19.15/1000 people per year, or (given 7 billion people in the world) 134,050,000 births per year.  If we're charitable and assume the births that lead to maternal deaths are even included in that "total births" figure, that means that *even including third-world countries*, the percentage of births that result in maternal deaths is just 0.2%.  That's 1 in 500.  Now don't get me wrong - that's still too high, and we should still be doing everything we can to bring it down, but in terms of mortality rate it's comparable to [taking up hang-gliding](http://www.healthymaniswhatiam.com/health/your-chance-of-dying-from-various-sports/) (1 in 560 chance of death), and people do that for *fun*.  You need to have *five* kids before your chance of dying in childbirth is even comparable to [your chance or dying in a car accident](http://www.livescience.com/3780-odds-dying.html) (1 in 100), but I don't see you posting long effortposts about safe driving or extreme sports.  Don't get me wrong here - I'm not arguing pregnancy-related mortality isn't a serious problem, and I'm not arguing more shouldn't be done about it.  I *am* arguing, however, that you've chosen a spectacularly bad opportunity to try to push your particular agenda on the issue, and that compared to things *many people do all day every day without even thinking, and for far less reason, reward or benefit*, pregnancy is actually *comparatively* safe.  Not *absolutely* safe, but well within the bounds of what normal, reasonable people are happy to risk without batting an eyelid or even thinking twice about the risks.  &gt; What I'm saying here is not irrelevant, because if hijacking and "hacking" something that exists mechanistically within women causes as many side effects as it does, then the notion that a male pill will be around any time soon seems dimmer still.  FWIW I think you're now arguing the same point as me, but choosing to phase it differently.  I'm saying "the female pill's mechanism is comparatively simple and safe compared to proposed male pills, which is why male pills are not yet available", whereas you're saying "female pills and pregnancy are potentially hideously dangerous and scary, and hence male pills are *even more* potentially hideously dangerous and scary, which is why male pills are not yet available".  The thing is, my comment is a *relative* one, so there's no actual point of contention between our positions at all.
Chauster's face.... op
An empty room?
If you are going to be doing Serious Welding spend the money to get a GOOD Helmet.  If you are going to be a lot of tack welding or shorter welds, you can get away with a simple Jackson Helmet with a #10 shade.  I say stay away from any of the Auto-Dark helmets unless they are Miller personally.
Beiber, like any artist signed to a major label worth two shits, had to go through artist development phase which is an incredible amount of work. As much as reddit would like to think other wise, Beiber worked his ass off to get where he is and works even more now that he is where he is.  Edit: Im stating the truth, but if it makes you feel better about yourselves to downvote it, im here for you.
uninstall then reinstall Java? Might be a random bug with Java.
I don't believe this. If someone wants to kill their husband, they will. 
I hated the documentary Detropia for a bunch of reasons, but mostly because the way it tried to paint the Hygenic Dress League as the progressive artistic future of Detroit made me physically ill.
TIL people from Utah are called Utards.
Only a little biased....
Look, I could do without otherkin, vegans and TiTP. We should all understand that /r/TumblrinAction should always/is always going to include content *and* political leanings you don't personally like.
I wanna say it has something to do with running through the lava for him but there's a high chance i'm wrong. I thought I remembered reading something that said that. Oh well
true, but if you want to go all flapping, and still be all flying, you have bat, visage, jakiro, skywrath, puck, and OD all as options.
&gt; It's guilty vs not guilty of the charges brought against you.   Yes? So you are saying that you could be guilty in some other charge regarding the same incident?   It's still a different charge that you can only be found one of two things....   &gt; You still killed someone.   But you are not guilty of the charge laid against you, which is all that matters from a legal stand point..  
I wish I could give you an extra upvote for your username. 
They also have a [website](http://www.frys.com/search?query_string=&amp;cat=-68896&amp;pType=pDisplay&amp;sort=price%20asc&amp;start=0&amp;cat=-68896&amp;from=0&amp;to=24). Some things are in-store only but there's still a lot of deals there.
Reaper
Rexall is in edmonton, Canada. no dea here fella. just good folk. 
Neither word inherently implies anything. People infer that 'they' implies personhood while 'it' does not.  If people started treating 'it' as a valid descriptor for a person, then it would be a valid descriptor for a person.
The staff are professional and I'm most fairly certain they will.
Happy mutt's day!
I completely agree that their bottle prices are a little to be desired. A 22oz of Racer 5 here goes for $6 when I can get it at Fred Meyers on 3rd &amp; 85th for $4.49.   Where they win is at their growlers. You can bring in your own 64oz growler or buy one theirs. I personally use their half growler for most of my beer. Growler prices run from $12 to $16 on average, so a 32oz half growler is $6 to $8, which is cheaper (as we both know) than most of their bottles.   Other areas they win at: You can bring in dogs, have a pint, play games (they do trivia and euchre nights), and most of their staff is cool.  Other areas they suck at: You can bring small kids, which means strollers. Once I become a parent and have an understanding of it all, this one will move to the win column. 
Like if you're lucky your crosshairs show up red invisible
Better yet... It's Texas.
Ohhhh, gotcha. They always show him in different places that's why I wondered
Angelina Jolie, Brad Pitt, Liam Neeson, Daniel Craig, &amp;  Clive Owen to name a few.
You spelled H4 wrong.
Nice. :)
Many things from original Jackass segments are taken from hollywood movies and other things....  For example, in cool hand luke he eats 50 hard boiled eggs as a bet.  So Jackass did it FOR REAL in season one I believe and the results were horrifically disgusting.  Source: I'm a Jackass Historian. (lol.)
I was 7 and was enjoying life going on neopets and watching pokemon.
This is absolutely true.   They're in a very sticky situation right now,  and they know it.  Releasing some of their most profitable IPs on any other system would give people just the right amount of Mario to keep them away from the new systems.   Not to mention it would really cheapen the authenticity of Nintendo if they were to hop on the mobile market now. After being so exclusively Nintendo for so long. 
Sorry
This thread is just a jumping off point.  Here is a [nice collection of cringepics](http://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/search?q=faces+of+atheism&amp;restrict_sr=on) just waiting to be browsed
Luke jumps off into abyss not because he's commiting suicide but because his chances of survival are greater in that direction at that point in time. As for blowing up the death stars, I'd hardly call either an easy victory.
Wear a string of pearls. No one suspects the girl in pearls. 
I told zap to post it up in the banner.
Mike Richards, Carter, or Bobrovsky
Thank you! I want a brand new pink one:)
So now journalists skim the fields for faulty but ambitious undergrad papers possibly written to attract the very sensationalist reporters that come knocking? 
It's not like her acting career has been very active. /s  http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0601553/
gunzerker?
i hate the idea that some have that although they're overpriced, they're still good--like fuck noooooo, they're fucking garbage.
ahh the tecre. nice. :) thanks
I agree that there are cork sniffers there, but majority still aren't. Have you seen the PT mini/nano threads? Those are really inspiring.  The Jan Ray hype was bad, and the people who took the dive talked a lot (there weren't even a lot, to be honest) but there were others who were very skeptical even when the Jan Ray was backed up with artists like Scott Henderson. I mean, come on, people make fun of the Klon. Even if the majority like the Timmy, you'll still see people who have tried it and didn't like it.   I'm not saying you should follow everything TGP is saying, but saying that the forum has only one mindset is wrong as well. I mean, it's the same for reddit, despite claims of a hivemind etc. I suppose it's just a good place to get opinions/comparisons of things. Add that to online demos and sound clips and you can make a better decision looking for stuff. Maybe know what kinda sound you're after, the budget etc (cheap, mid budget like Barber, expensive like Wampler, shit expensive like I won't even mention), then you're all set. I guess TGP really has helped me since I'm not from USA and I can't try pedals before I buy them. I just rely on research and demos. 
This is not a phone that is being marketed at the masses nor is it a phone being marketed at those who don't want to give up 800$ all at once, it was compared to F1 racing. I fully understand the lack of lower price points below the cost of a phone as well. They said this is an opportunity for those with in the community who want to buy a low production extremely high quality device developed by Canonical that showcases the cutting edge of the proposed software and hardware abilities. They set the number at right around 40,000 for the production run and that's been the goal all along to sell a year in advance around 40,000 phones. The $20 dollar level which is essentially a minimum donation to the cause is a nice treat at a low cost for those who want to see this technology get pushed but can't afford this device, but I think it still misses the point of the campaign. If there are 40,000, well now more than 40,000 due to the new price points, people who want to get a limited quantity phone at a high cost then Canonical will create that device if not they will continue to work on the software so it can be placed on production model phones in the future. If you can't afford 800 for limited production phone than this campaign isn't for you, in the same way if Apple made a limited edition Iphone5 you and I probably couldn't afford it.   If it was a $600 phone it would be a different story, but for $800 it's a hard pill to swallow especially this early in advance.   I also think we will see Ubuntu Phone/Ubuntu for Android available for purchase on a device in the coming year or two just that it will come from a large manufacturer who uses an already existing android phone production line and then loading the software on to it. That's really where Canonicals goals are with Ubuntu not in a low production high cost device.
Look at them to see the letter.  Problem solved
Is there a black border around the screen?
Starting a blog is easy: you pick a free hosting platform, pick a username and blog name, sign up for an account, and write. Google around for lists of writing prompts or questions if you feel like you don't know what to write about, and if you write every day for long enough, your brain will start organizing your thoughts into the form of posts habitually.   To get around your insecurity, you might want to publish your first blog under a false identity -- possibly even an identity who has interests that you don't fully agree with. That way you can practice your writing skills without feeling like any criticism of your writing is criticizing you as a person. If it's well-received, you can connect the blog with your "real" self later on. If people don't like it much, you'll at least know that nobody you respect will ever know about it, and so it can't change their opinions of you.  So, starting just any old blog is pretty straightforward. All the paraphernalia of "successful" blogging is what's difficult to get: followers, ad revenue, good discussions in the comments, and so on. If you want lots of followers, it'd probably be helpful to focus your main blog on an interesting topic and then tactfully distribute links to your posts in forums related to that topic. 
How do they know how many refills you get?
Sorry i posted saying not very helpful i meant someone else.
173
...throw them in the trash then? Who the fuck does not know about  these things?
this type of input is what makes reddit great.
Not pastry chef.
Or maybe Jesse is Icarus.   He was also in a shitty situation and Walter gave him the tools to really, truly turn his life into something else in a kind of father-son relationship.  I really think Walter is going to get Jesse killed.
The weapon names are all effed up,this is not the first time I notice this...hmmm
I *think* that you have to ask about Mara's beliefs, and he will explain some things, and in there he mentions marriage. Then you should be able to ask about have a wedding.
People who haven't seen this trailer might think thats an actual female stripper
Thought I'd save you the disappointment if you still haven't reinstalled it. I just gave SH3 a go for the first time since release. Still no Kingmaker or Skirmish modes. Pretty abysmal all around. I thought the most tragic thing was the fact that they didn't even record new voices for the majority of the in-game units.
Indiana jones and that crystal skull crap. 
Looking for offers/links to any known collectors.
NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO
I object because this title implies that you texted it as you thought of it while in the shower, and who the hell has a waterproof cell phone?
You don't don't know about our lord Geezus Kryst?
What lights exactly would that be for a portion of code 3 lights? 
I can look on my desk and see pretty much anything I have as "culturally appropriating" if I want it to.
But don't we already have gentlemen Cho'gath?
This is where I fall normally too.  It's resistance.  I have a younger brother.  In the past, I'd be orgasming to porn and letting him do whatever.  Now I take a more hands-on approach AND I play the piano quite a bit because it gives me a way to vent my energy.
That's what I thought OP was handling 
Yeah, but cupcakes and chocolate?  You're right that someone with that bad of a peanut allergy is clearly not made for life around peanuts. Nothing to do with Hitler, just an observation and fact.   However, in this day an age, I'm sure there's some kind of medication for it. I think I asked somewhere else in the thread, what would these people do at work? Or in an airplane where all pax are given peanuts? At school they might try to control the environment, but they can't do it forever. 
I like cake.
I don't know why it's not a better-known site, but Eli Helmuth has a [killer website](http://climbinglife.com/rocks/instructional-videos) with, among many other things, **great** instructional videos on everything from placing gear, building ice and rock anchors, and vertical rescue to rappelling and ascending.  As far as I know, it's the best resource on the web for what you're looking for.
House.  The last 10 minutes were great, the rest was a hollow parade of people who had been on the show once.
Probably.  I'm getting to the point where I only want to wear basketball shorts, all day, everyday. 
thanks! im from australia too so i'll deffinitely be on :)
THIS. IS. AWESOME.
A scanner, Photoshop, and a printer.
I'm much more a fan of http://generatewp.com/post-type/  Since it also has a lot more generators and you get to see the code generated as you make changes so you can learn a bit more on what is really happening while filling in the fields.
**THAT WAS SEASON THREE OH MY GOSH YOU FOOL.** I sort of love that show xD  The Conjuring had a creepy doll!! Gahhhhh
I think this is a bad signing.  I'm not saying he doesn't deserve it, I'm saying you have nothing to lose in making him earn it this season. If he ends up healthy &amp; as strong as he was post-AS game, then you match the best offer out there.  If it's a max, then fair enough, you pay him.  If he battles injury or regresses, then you can reassess his value &amp; match the market contract someone else is willing to give him.  Restricted free agency is the ultimate leverage for the team so what's the rush in bidding against yourselves a year too early?
Oh great, thanks! [My channel](http://www.youtube.com/user/iyellatvideogames) is just my username, but I linked it anyway. I never even though to ask for extra materials; is there a game logo of any kind? Like for a main menu, even though I know that isn't in the game yet. It would definitely help with the thumbnail if I didn't have to use generic text for the logo. If there is just PM me, it would be greatly appreciated. 
Not sure yet lol. I really want all three though. Look over my list again and see what you can find to even it out a little
I sometimes feel that way, and sometimes I get aroused. So no porn for me if I am alone
They block their own advertisements in other countries? Who thought this was a good business idea?
This is awesome. You sir are an Internet scholar and gentleman
it's a 2011 anniversary edition TOJ harrington - they are pretty hard to fine because there aren't a ton out there, but plenty of other folks make good Harrington's - if I hadn't gone with this I'd be wearing a Baracuda
That's why I would feel no pity if mgmt &amp; Mr. Fingermuffin fell into his machine press...
I'd rather have a cat since that is the national animal of Reddit. Thoughts?
I love our Balkan contingent (get well soon Nasty)
A Mac. Go ahead, spew your typical anti-apple hate if you're that type, but for a future animation student it's a dream come true. And now that the whole family is completely OS X and iOS-ified things click a whole lot more technologically than when we were all on Windows.
I want video 
hide ya kids, hide ya wife and hide ya husband cuz they rapin eybody out here
george wostenholm ixl is something special. nice razor hope you plan to restore it
Sex is awesome. Wrap it up and do it. Enjoy your youth. Get some.
I was just about to say the same thing. I had a sister, and I would do this to her dolls. It hilarious to see her reaction
SWEEET SWEEEEEEEET SWEET VICTORY
Well that kinda sucks, they got the IP at around E3, so assuming it gets released in early 2015 they will only have had a chance to work on it for 1½ years. Even if they release it in late 2015 that's still just a little over 2 years where they aren't even fully focused on it because of Battlefield 4.  2 years isn't a lot of time to develop a completely new game so I'm afraid it's just going to be a Battlefield game with star wars skin.
I always love the connections I find between Judaism and Catholicism, there is a surprising (well, surprising for people who think there is no connection) amount that Catholicism inherited from Judaism. Most Catholics don't even realize that a Catholic mass is actually a (highly modified) Seder (since the last supper is generally identified as a Passover meal).  I just really connect with how you explain how to read the Old Testament. It's true, but there is so much depth and meaning we can read from the text and between the lines that you can read the Old Testament over and over and find new insights every time. (Of less relevance to Judaism, there is a huge number of parallels and references to the Old Testament in the New Testament, and you need to know your Old Testament well to understand the depth of the symbolism in the new). Of course there is also a strong reliance on tradition to understand some of the nuances as well. A little more trippy is that post-Jesus development of Judaic tradition has a lot of meaning when Christians see it (for example, some of the changes to the Passover meal a few centuries after Christianity first emerged, like the breaking of the middle matzoh). I guess it's to be expected between two religions that share such a large common history.  Anyhoo, cheers to our Jewish brothers!
They're very well made and reliable guns. They're great tote around guns because ammo is cheap! Also consider a Ruger Mark III Hunter .22. Its a great pistol!
Thanks for the insight! Can you give me a good ratio that I should use for PG to herb?
Nice choice, but your wallet is screwed :)
&gt;I feel like a horrible person for even saying things like that...  You are horrible and you should feel horrible! :P
They also mentioned making a copy of the downloaded content so you have a back up. =)
/r/moviescirclejerk has been outjerked
It's not only going to be popular in the U.S. but other parts of the world too. I believe the many that are in this sub-reddit were carry-overs from 1.0 and anyone else that got into the closed beta and those that subbed to keep up to date on news for FFXIV. I expect numbers to swell once everyone that wasn't in closed beta gets a taste in open beta.  WoW is getting stale and has since lost many of it's subscribers. Who's to say they're not looking for something fresh to get started on? I can't speak for them of course.
Thanks
Gattis is going to be out of the lineup because of that guy.  How long can they legally keep him on a rehab assignment? 
Not the point of a business. Get real.
Slater's still pissed about Jesse and her caffeine pills....
Can you use any wheel for the Mac or are there specific ones that wont work? Im hopefully going to start getting things setup soon and have been unsure what to do wheel wise yet. (Side note, iv been hoping to get something that I can eventually use on the Xboxone also even though I probably wont need it very often. However nobody knows any details on that yet so I probably wont worry about it.)
Kassius Ohlé
And to make it worse... its small...
It's the definition of a thankless job, really.
snitches get stitches cause they little bitches
Brain's evolution is like an ice cream scoop, you can only pile a scoop on top of another scoop.  Since rats and humans are mamals we have similar brain structure/organization. One of the major difference is of course size, much larger pre-frontal cortex and more "wrinkles" (which means there is more surface area and more neurons packed inside. A rat brain comparatively looks reall smooth, almost no wrinkles).  We have motor centers, vision centers and sensory centers all in the similar areas.  (We even have a lizard brain at the core, we refer to it as emotional center, your olfactory sense, unlike all of your other sensory inputs, is directly connected to this part of the brain. Which is why you can have such a strong emotional response to a smell)
Oh noes. God forbid someone like things you don't like.
you finally did it man  it's all ogre now
As a Braves fan first and a Tigers fan second, all I can say is that I wish the Tigers had more than a 2 game series against them.  The Nats were completely outclassed.
duh fuck lol
Wheat in the U.S. Has been genetically engineered to have four times as much gluten as wheat naturally has, and still has in other countries. There's some evidence that the genetically altered gluten, as well as the extreme quantity of it, is causing more people to have intolerances to it.  Though, obviously part of it is people who think it's a health fad, and go on gluten free diets for no reason just because they think it's healthy. Avoiding gluten altogether while eating other carbs has zero benefit if you have no intolerances.
A#1, man.
Cabot AR?
I was looking for more individual grading policies.
wow, I've never heard of that! Just tried looking around using only my head, it's really hard not to move my eyes as well. Thanks for explaining.
Try being from West Virginia...
There has to be a reason they are so cheap... shady
also, in gen 5 games aren't the HMs generally for side story stuff? i'm still in the middle of black but i'm pretty sure i've seen that said before
Never seen one
Wow that looks great! :) I've never heard of this brand and just looked them up - how do you find their polishes? 
Thanks for proving my point so beautifully. 
we close at 5
Listening to right wing talk radio I sometimes think there is a bigger rift between the GOP an their far right base than the GOP and the Dems.  
865
I think the word you're looking for is *Chafed*
I've had the misfortune of stepping on a nail not once, but two times!
Thanks for the input.  I do mostly edit photos, but as I do more and more video I have been feeling the pain with my old sony laptop.
Something about this hit me just right and I laughed so hard that my son thought I was choking. So, thanks.
"It appears she left.."
When her uncle was in his early 20s, it's quite possible that that was true, assuming he's old enough. Most women who went to college married, dropped out of school, and had kids. Now the graduation rate of women is much higher than men. Her uncle's probably old and doesn't realize that things have changed since he was her age.
See, blog spam, name calling when criticized, and delusions of being singled out for victimization by corporations are exactly why you got banned.  Also, you're not invited to my child's birthday party so consider yourself additionally censored. 
She's wearing a nude dress underneath
Or:  /r/aww+wtf
Asus P9X79 DELUXE
Shadowrun Returns, and Chrono Trigger on my new phone via SNESdroid
Might just pop to r/popping thought you guys might like a quick look.  This site has slightly changed me as a person, I now find myself preying on the misfortune  of others for your entertainment. Here is another zoomed in of the funky gunk.  http://imgur.com/t1nOaW7 
Wow. The end....
I love the reference.
&gt; And what the video is arguing is that "employing" someone for any amount, including nothing, is better than that individual not working at all (if we're to use your logic of reductio ad absurdum).   Yes.  &gt;I don't accept the premise that raising minimum wage necessarily results in a loss of employment.  Then you are laboring under a misconception. Businesses do not employ a magical number of persons and then say "OK we're done." They hire the amount of persons they can afford to pay. If you raise the minimum amount someone can be paid you are necessarily causing people on the low end to loose jobs and preventing people who are not yet employed from getting jobs.
I disagree. It's just as awkward as you expect.
*cartooniest*
Shhhh, no-shhh shh, no, that's not- .....no.
Too bad that's not an exclusive.
A guy at a bus stop told me I reminded him of Liv Tyler "in a good way". I don't see much of a resemblance.
Bioshock Infinite, Borderlands 2, waiting for benchmark/character creator :)
Racist. 
I have three, but my next door neighbor has only one. I had my oldest one (8 yrs) alone for a year before I got her a bud and in my neighbor's case and mine, they loved being only ferrets. It can't really hurt to get them a buddy, but the minute you do, the personal bond that you have lessens significantly. When I had one ferret, she would sleep at the foot of my bed when I was sleeping at night. When I got her bud, they bonded and she never did it again. I kinda miss it. WHen I watch my neighbor's fert when she is out of town, he really instigates human play a lot more than my two young twits do. They DO instigate play with me, leg jumps and such, but its just that Arlo (neighbor pet) really loves to. He is a happy, healthy guy that is totally cool without a buddy. The only downside I have noticed is that a single ferrets ears get dirty because they do not have anyone to clean them but my neighbor uses coconut oil in his and it works just fine. : ) 
~finishing?
This little crapper is 7 weeks old. Born a cards fan.
Nice, I believe I have the same exact wheels as you do.  Black powder coated 17" Santa Monicas? Same color paint on the beetle too.. I should post a photo when I get home. :D
"You guys play like a bunch of people who don't play very well!"
Yes if you value your furniture. And yes you can't go too far in. Just enough to de-dagger.
No kidding. "Picture has a thousand words?" Way more than that I'd figure... 
Something happened! ...and thats why the cop hit the kid and ran away.  http://i.imgur.com/J1q9wI9.jpg 
Haha I'm exactly what you described in that first paragraph. I hug a LOT and say I love you to even strangers.
I've seen that fearcrads has trying to be a friend to wings he should take the friendly advice.
using words like "why" or "how" instead of "what" can help allot lol
Or, y'know, get a healthcare system that makes sense and isn't dependent on people getting insurance from their employer
What, like sweaty balls?  Or clean out of the shower balls?
Last sentence, is it about the netbook or the cat?
[](/thatswhatshysaid)Not *publicly*.
A reason to hate the Saints? They single handily cheated their way to a superbowl that we should've gone to. 
Since in turn you've convinced me that I'm the one who can maybe be a positive element here, I dug a little to find the research Mr. Moore references.  [Prohibition and Public Health By HAVEN EMERSON, M.D. (1932)](https://docs.google.com/viewer?url=http://64.62.200.70/PERIODICAL/PDF/TheSurvey-1928dec01/15-19/)  and the relevant charts with the data  http://puu.sh/3QDSv.png  The solid line is population while the dotted line is death from alcoholism. See the steady incline as a result of population growth. Notice between 1915 and 1920 you see a decline in alcoholism anyway. Note the rapid incline immediately after prohibition begins and during the prohibition years.  http://puu.sh/3QDQh.png  Again, this one just shows the same thing but with cirrhosis related deaths as well. Plus it breaks the chart into 3 groups (pre-prohibition, war-time, and prohibition) making it easier to see the decline then rise in the chart.  http://puu.sh/3QDTJ.png http://puu.sh/3QDTU.png  These two charts highlight a decrease in deaths by alcoholism during prohibition years. This ones the one that will trip you up if you don't realize what's happening. The declines are the results of the previous years sharp declines not the same years because alcoholism itself was actually increasing during most of those years. Combine that with people not wanting to incriminate themselves for breaking the law and it's easy to get skewed results. There's probably something to say about the states these surveys were taken from in regard to prohibition as well but we hardly need to go farther to prove the point. The fact remains clear that prohibition isn't what caused a decline in death rates, alcoholism had already hit an all time low leading up to the beginning of prohibition. Prohibition managed to happen during years where death rates were going to be low anyway due to unattributed factors and this is used as an opportunity to spin the positive effects as being due to Prohibition. Meanwhile alcoholism is actually on the rise as a result of prohibition.  So now tell me what you believe based on the same evidence. Was it actually how Mr. Moore says it was, or was there more to it than that?
My way of thinking:  Didn't start study for a test that is in 2 days?  I am going to fail --&gt; I am going to be kicked out of college ---&gt; no job = no love = no marriage= no kids = loneliness = depression = homeless = death.   0_0 all because of that stupid test
[Handihelp](http://www.handihelp.net/) - ideas, plans and tools to adapt to challenges, created by a man who is quadriplegic.   [Wheelchair Life](http://www.wheelchairlife.net/Set_Up_Your_Home_For_Wheelchair.html) - information on home changes  [Craig Hospital Nurse Advice Line](http://www.craighospital.org/Left-Nav/Specialty-Services/SCI-Nurse-Advice-Line/) - not really specific to adaptive stuff for the home, but this is a really good resource to have for anyone who has a SCI or cares for someone who does. Quick free way to reach a nurse who specializes in spinal cord injury. It's like "Ask-A-Nurse" for people with SCI. 
http://caffrinluvstmgc.tumblr.com/image/57010255722  Okay..
You either have HBO go or you live on a boat with a parrot.
First post here in a while, and this has been this way for a long time. If you have any comments on game mechanics and balance concerning spell vamp, I might be interested in hearing about them.
**Olenna Tyrell defeats Littlefinger**  The white weirwood door of the High Hall opened with a sudden creak. Two tall guards strode into the hall, flanking the aisle, identical in height and clad in identical arms, armour, and surcoats. *Green*, Sansa observed, *green with gold roses*. *Could it really be....it is...*  Olenna Tyrell entered the room, her servants following close behind. Sansa looked up to weirwood seat of House Arryn, and observed Littlefinger as he stood up and then walked down the few steps that lay before it. Sansa was used to visitors...but the Queen of Thorns? It was like a ghost of her days of court, come back to visit her...  "My lady," Petyr said with a wry smile, "you are most welcome at the Vale of Arryn..."  "Vale of Arryn, is it? I see no Arryns. Tell me, are they hiding behind the drapes, hmm? Perhaps under the carpet?" The Queen of Thorns was clearly as prickly as ever.  "Our young Robert is taking a nap, my lady, please forgive his absence. As Lord Protector of the Vale, I give you his welcome. We so seldom have guests this high up in the sky."  "So I noticed, Lord Baelish. I had to ride up in a cage to get here. I felt more like a bird than a rose." Sansa noticed the old woman shift her gaze from Petyr to her.  "Sansa, is that truly you? Of course it is, my dear. I hope this man has been treating you well; I've heard it can get awfully cold and lonely up here in the Eyrie. Tell me, where are the lords and knights of the Vale?"  "My lord has been treating me very well, like his own daughter. Our bannermen are off on a foray against the Mountain Clans." Sansa had been instructed to say those words to any questioning guest. In truth, the lords and knights of the Vale were off in their holdfasts, plotting - but none could outwit Littlefinger, she suspected.   Lady Olenna turned to her retinue, for a brief moment. "Leave me", she said "Not you two, Left and Right. You two will stay."  "You won't be needing guards here, my lady", Lord Baelish assured her.  "Perhaps not, but I am quite fond of my two men. As you say, though. Left and Right, stand outside the hall." Sansa remembered them from King's Landing as well. Erryk and Arryk they were named, or Left and Right, as the Queen of Thorns called them. They stood at attention, their hands on the hilts of their swords, and then turned and marched out, their steps falling in perfect unison.   "Sansa, my dear, should you be here&gt;", Olenna asked, but Littlefinger answered for her. "You can speak freely in front of her. Now, tell me, Lady Tyrell, what do you think of the Vale, and this , well, *stout* castle."  "We can beat around the bush all day, Lord Baelish, and all we will have to show for it is a ragged shrub. I won't prevaricate. I've come for Lady Sansa."  *Me?* Sansa thought. *What could she want of me?*  "I'm sorry, I do not understand", Littlefinger replied.  "What is there to understand? I am asking for Sansa. My granddaughter is the Queen, you know, and my son, Lord Puff Fish, the hand."  "I'm afraid that..."  "There's no need to be afraid, Baelish, unless you plan on doing something rash. Sansa is to marry my grandson Willas. We arranged this quite some time ago, though we never got 'round to it. Tell him, my dear."  *Willas? But that was ages ago?* "It is true", Sansa muttered, confused. She did not know quite what was going on. "I was to marry Willas...but then..."  Baelish took up her sentence. "But then the Lannisters married you to the Imp. So that..."  "That they did, Lord Protector of the Vale." Littlefinger looked sour. He did not like to be interrupted. "Well, the Imp has agreed to annul his marriage, and will allow my grandson to wed the Lady Stark, as was planned. Now that his lord father is dead, he feels "emboldened", as he put it. He seems to have grown quite friendly with Garlan, and it was them who made the deal. The fact that Garlan saved his skin by slaying that brute of a man known as the Mountain certainly didn't hurt."  "Arrangements have been made, I'm afraid." Littlefinger rarely seemed angry. This was one of those rare occasions.  "And arrangements can be broken, or have you missed what I just said?"  "I will not just give you Sansa..."  "Who said anything about giving? Surely Sansa can decide for herself."  "I am her uncle, by marriage. I am Lord Protector of the Vale."  "Ah, yes, Lord Protector of the Vale. How the small have risen. But just look what a state the Vale is in - it is no secret that your lords bannermen plot behind your back. They don't take kindly to being ordered about by an upjumped jackanape such as yourself. All the meanwhile, the Mountain Clans raid all along the roads. You have no army, my Lord."  "I have gold." All of Littlefinger's courtesies were gone now. "Gold buys..."  "Men, yes. Tyrion Lannister figured that out. His father made him Master of Coin in your stead, before he was taken by illness, don't you recall?"  "Yes, I recall, I was there when it occurred."  "You do think we are all simpletons, don't you? To you, we are all just Moon Boys with grand titles and names older than that of your own. Well, your replacement figured out your scheme. How many gold dragons did you leave the realm in debt? Six million dragons, was it? Or eight?"  "The Kings spent the coins, I only found them."  "Oh yes, and no doubt Robert and Joffrey were stupid enough to let you *find them*. Cersei too, as long as you borrowed from her lord father. Well, Highgarden's vaults aren't quite so deep as those of Casterly Rock, and we keep track of our coin. For the throne to be in so much debt, Robert and Joffrey would have had to be staging tournaments every few months. My son, the hand, may be an oaf, but when Tyrion brought him those ledgers and his maesters looked them over, he was certainly none too pleased with what he saw. Your scam has come to an end."  "You seem to forget, Tyrell, this is *my* castle."  "The Eyrie is yours, is it? Like Harrenhal? I thought this was the Arryn's seat? And I'm sure my son will find Harrenhal a new owner. Perhaps a Frey. Lord Walder has more sons than a stray dog, no doubt one of them will jump at the opportunity to hold that cursed heap of stone."  "I will not let you leave with Sansa. Guards!" Sansa looked at the door, but no one came. "Guards!"  Sansa gasped...  "By now, I suspect that Left and Right have taken care of your guards. Them, and the rest of my retinue."  "How could it be? You only had two dozen men?" Sansa heard herself say.  "Did I?" The Queen of Thorns was smiling, Sansa could see. "Who told you that? Those knights in charge of those little keeps that guard the path up the mountain to this hovel of yours? Sellswords, more like." She turned back to Littlefinger. "You of all people should know that sellswords can be bought. Oh, but you never imagined that someone would match your price. As Master of Coin, you controlled the the four Keepers of the Keys, the King's Counter, the King's Scales, and the Royal Mints. Not to mention that half the tax-collecters, harbormasters, and customs sergeants in the realm were in your pay. Well, the Mint of Lannisport was easy to get control of, as was the Mint of Oldtown. Gulltown was another matter, of course. That is, it was another matter until the Lords of the Vale - Royce, Caron, the whole lot - decided that it was time to end this show of yours. Oh, did I forget to mention -  their armies are surrounding the Giant's Lance. I should imagine that they have stationed archers and billmen in every pass by know. Those Mountain Savages that the Imp knew were certainly useful at "preventing" your scouts from reporting our advances. Them and that Lord Bronn of his... he originally wanted to assault this place with climbing spikes, like some wildling raider."   "Now who are you calling a wilding". The door swung open again, and in stepped a cluster of Tyrell men-at-arms, but leading them was a grizzled man in a shirt of ringmail, his right hand resting casually on the hilt of his sword. He too Sansa recognized from King's Landing. "Last time I was here, some old knight tried to kill me This time, it was half a dozen guards. It seems this place doesn't like me much. Oh, Lord Baelish, I was instructed by my patron to give you this message: 'A Lannister always pays his debts,' he said. There was something about a dagger, too, but I can't quite recall what it was."  The Queen of Thorns stepped forth.  "Sansa, my dear, I think you'll be coming with me know. You too, Littlefinger. I trust you won't mind a few chains?"
It's beautiful inside, white marble floors. I attended a friend's wedding there a couple years ago.
This might be the start of something beautiful
See the 21 day trial thread.
Considering that people joined the military for it, and still do, it would be pretty catastrophic for the government. 
What a sweet looking girl, she looks just like my 10 year old, Ginger.  I can tell you loved her and she loved you back!  Thanks for being such a good dog Annie! Wish I could have met you! 
Was it in Assault? I think it's the base structure that is there in Conquest. The server version for it in Assault probably still has the structure on that spot.  Or maybe it's some other object that's there server side but not on client side.
Dammit. You people and your onions.
Nah. I learned quick. Here in the US if I don't run a tab and pay after each drink, tipping with each, I get faster service. When I tipped in a UK bar and was still put into 'line' when I went up for another drink, I didn't leave another.
&gt;Do you like real live ponies, or only cartoon ones made to look human?  The cartoon kind exclusively (non-anthro). As for real life, I grew up with my family owning a stable and after years of shoveling horse shit I can say with certainty I have no interest in performing anything sexual with actual mares, stallions, or geldings, although I recognize not everyone necessarily shares my position. &gt;How did you get into this "fetish"?  I saw images of cartoon my little ponies depicted with sexual organs doing erotic things, and it aroused me. I then got a boner and proceeded to masturbate. This is the intended trajectory of internet porn.   &gt;Was it related to watching MLP as a kid?   What, you mean the show that played in the 80s and 90s? I think my sister watched it sometimes but I never really saw it.  &gt;do you feel the show is in itself specialized to a certain degree and has in a way guided you into this subreddit and love of MLP erotica?   I don't think the writers or artists ever intended for me to masturbate to their creations, no. If that's what you mean.  &gt;Is the MLP fan base really ripe with people who find the characters at least sexually arousing?  I don't think anyone here is qualified to answer this because we are all limited to our own personal experiences. But from my own interactions, more often than not, most adult fans (be they male or female) find at least one character in the show appealing in the same way they would as if the character were entirely human. Whether this is strictly platonic or romantic or even sexual, is entirely dependent on the individual (beauty, eye of the beholder, etc.).   I find it fascinating and I believe this says a lot about our mate selection process, and how our social wiring (e.g. mirror neurons) is 'tricked' in media from certain cues that results in us having fondness for fictional characters, and in some cases extreme fondness or attraction. It's interesting that characteristics like certain personality traits, "cute" features, etc. can elicit emotions within us from characters who aren't even human. What was the question again? I dunno, probably. It's hard to keep yourself from jacking off when you see Twilight Sparkles ass.  &gt;Any other information on how you learned you liked this sort of stuff.  I first saw it on 4chan, like all extremely questionable pornography you'd off yourself if a family member found it on your computer. But that wasn't really where it started, since feral furry porn was always hot to me. I used to go to a website callled yiffstar a lot when I was younger and look at the porn and read the erotica section for it. Later on /v/ introduced me to kemono loli and shota and after a few years of jerking off to that, the step towards Pony porn was only natural, especially since a lot of kemo pixiv artists starting drawing it. I'm not really sure what else to put here. People say the internet (namely 4chan) erode away at sexual normality but I don't think that's very true, I think we have the bizarre sexual or otherwise inclinations we have to begin with and we only discover them since the internet exposes us to things we just never knew we liked before. Kind of like a Russian KGB sleeper agent in the cold war hearing the code word that activates them and then they kill their maid or something.
Thank you! =]
I was replying to a comment that already established this.
Copenhagen Long Cut, Scotch, and Steak...but if steak doesn't count as a snack (which it should), then I'll go with Copenhagen Long Cut, black coffee, and cake.
The: "Yo, what'd I miss, you guys. You guys?   i read that in his voice
still need help?
Honestly, I think my guy was doing it innocently. I just wasn't used to strangers touching me. But good for you, and if he had said anything like that, I would have at least told my parents. 
I have administered numerous injections of my genetic material to female test subjects: no change in ethnicity was observed.
I painted my set not because I needed to but because I felt it added some color. OP: any old primer will work (Zinser etc) and a decent exterior low sheen house paint is fine (probably find it for free in your neighbor's garage).
Everyone probably has his updates blocked.
Is gh15 the god of hormones guy? What's his deal? Also, why does he have such terrible spelling?
I love the puffin cereal. especiall peanut butter and chocolate. In fact I like it better than YOU and YOU CAN GO TO HELL.
At least she saved herself 40c!!
not a clue, I'm sure someone on google would know, but if you already have a wired 360 controller an OTG cable wont set you back much and they are damn useful to have even if it does not work with the controller 
haha hell yeah. Only thing I would change is the fact that it is not a wagon. Other than that I love driving this thing. The 4 cyl that is in it is pretty slow but still fun. I imagine it to be like a 4 door miata. 
[Think Tank Retrospective 5](http://www.thinktankphoto.com/products/retrospective-5-pinestone.aspx) would be my choice. Excellent quality and a very non camera baggy look. There are larger ones as well if you feel it's too small. Check youtube for reviews, there're lots of them! Edit: spelling
&gt; Agreed. This conversation was not about using VPN's to securely connect between networks... it was about whether or not the NSA can read the data of someone browsing over a VPN, just as they would be able to read it from that person's home computer. The answer is yes. Period.  Okay, to that end you're totally correct. The OP's investment might have been wasted when it comes to secure communications, but personally I thought we were talking about the concepts here. The "data transferred" part of the question had me thinking too deeply about what he meant, I guess. A VPN is a very powerful tool for secure communications between two(or more) networks, but yes it won't stop them from reading your traffic on it's way to an http service on the public Internet. 
Came here to see if anyone else saw that. Seriously, wtf gaijin? Are you pissed that the 109's and Corsairs are too strong for similarly tiered Russian planes or something?  No russian bias my ass.
Ive already explained blatantly ripping off a subreddit and circlejerking without permit, what else do you need?
That feeling u get when you know a few hours from now your going to have an extremely unpleasant conversation with someone
$35 here, no fucking joke.
I gave you an upvote just for the mushroom comment at the end. 
The way they teach formulaic essay writing in high school. When I got to university, the first paper of mine that was graded a comment that read, "This isn't high school. Learn to write an essay without a formula approach. You'll be out of here if you don't."  The teacher wasn't an ass, he turned out to be my favourite prof. It was valuable advice. 
In my case, scholarships. More than enough for tuition/room and board 
This is an office. I'm surrounded by them. Beware the carnage.
WOW. That's impressive.
[**Kyrr Havanna**](http://www.reddit.com/r/GrandLineRP/comments/1jfo6n/week_4_beginning_separation/cbedvxp) ___  *Kyrr notices a warrior at the counter talking to the bartender and decides to go talk to him. After all, any new friend would come in handy these days.*  Hey man, how's it goin'?
Why isn't this shit region locked it makes no fucking sense.
o-cay
Si no mataron a nadie, y ya los despidieron, publicar el video sin taparles la cara es exponerlos demasiado.  Así que ya sabemos. El gobierno puede publicar tus datos de la AFIP en cadena nacional si los criticás, te puede mostrar públicamente en video si quiere demostrar que los motorman (y no los trenes destartalados) generan accidentes, puede acusarte de expropiar chicos sin pruebas, o de ser parte de la dictadura, y no pedir disculpas cuando la evidencia está a tu favor.  Pero si estás en el nunca más, te acusan de desaparecer y torturar gente, y hay tantas pruebas en tu contra que hasta ONG y think tank cercanas al gobierno se te ponen en contra, la presidenta va a ponerte como jefe del ejército igual porque "no va a permitir ***linchamientos públicos***".
I think it means sausage, as in dongface.gif
Yep, they're supposed to be Infrared 6's but they have a Jordan 7 sole... Definitely fake.
On a tour while visiting Ireland :)  Here's a book backing it up: http://books.google.com/books?id=_M6b1eOnRhYC&amp;pg=RA2-PA1724&amp;lpg=RA2-PA1724&amp;dq=ireland+%22most+densely+populated%22+in+europe&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=5qApSkU61y&amp;sig=dJMqwdVkpP50XXlFVtPBrRXFveA&amp;hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;ei=QKT5UfiiGsKciQKso4CQAw&amp;ved=0CE4Q6AEwBQ#v=onepage&amp;q=ireland%20%22most%20densely%20populated%22%20in%20europe&amp;f=false
My wife is an Ansett, though alas not from the side of the family that had any of that airline money.
See also the gallery of Jason Kenney's best [ethnic photo ops](http://veryethnic.wordpress.com/2013/07/15/ethnic-photo-ops-the-pandoras-box-of-conservative-politics/).
It shouldn't have been a secret order in the first place. They shouldn't have to declassify it at all. If it was targeted requests where classifying it prevents the target from knowing about it, then I can understand the need for temporary secrecy.
This is why Console developers should develop for the PC as well. Because if Twisted Metal was also available on PC, there would some fans that would have carried it on by modding and what not. 
Yeah, I found the RW comments a bit confusing but the types of throws the writer was looking for weren't ones that I could judge from what I saw during camp.   The most I can say is that RW looked a lot better than TJack or Quinn. 
I just wanted to say, thank you for your input. It was a very interesting read, and I think it will clear up a lot of misconceptions about pedophilia and human sexuality in general.
Oh no! A videogame that is not realistic!
That must be how ive confused it. Thanks :-)
This is an extremely popular misconception. The shareholders-before-all-else "rule" is not a rule. It's just an ideology floated by Milton Friedman that took hold in the 70s and it is completely bunk. There is no law or historical rule that corporations' sole purpose is to maximize shareholder value.  http://www.forbes.com/sites/stevedenning/2011/11/28/maximizing-shareholder-value-the-dumbest-idea-in-the-world/
Exactly. There is no other way to get leather.
This. All you can control is how you react to it. Think about how you want to view how you handled the situation and treated her later, when she is gone, and rise above it. Then you will have no regrets and be better to learn from it. My alcoholic father finally drank himself to death when I was in my 20s. Sorry you have to go through this. If you can stand to be social about it, AlAnon is a great source of help.
The way I see it, that's only really important if it's measurably *more* harmful than what those involved would be doing otherwise - if not, it's just a symptom. And I don't see that.
Added.
Root.  Has quite a lot of different meanings in different countries.
Hits upon hits upon hits. I like it!
this sucks but ill get another one soon i guess. when i have the proper funds.
whats different about the silver one?
http://www.pitch.com/binary/dd35/1372267191-completed.jpg
... Really? I'm tired of the hate on pot in this sub. Weeds not a bad thing, it's a good thing.
South Park repopularized, but in the states it existed before hand.  Started with the mass Irish immigration from the potato famine.  Irish were then's equivalent to Hispanics today in the North while the South had problems with blacks.  Growing up "I'm going to beat you like a red headed step child" was uncommon, but not rare, as an example.  But until South Park the stigma was near dead.
I'm pretty sure she is just not trying to look in the camera.
brians are so dumb
army comp is army composition, i.e. what you use to attack with. Assuming you have 135 slots, I would use 6 WB, 9 giants, 48 archers, and 15 barbs/gobs.
With out a doubt the biggest data warehouse.  Buffering the entire internet for days? And that was 08 I'm sure they've upgraded.  Holy poo.
See [Wikipedia](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Croissant) for "Origin Stories" of the croissant -- the fatwa is not totally paranoid!
No I hate this fucking shit. I hate that there is a massive red NO sign on my potions and boots. You can't tell me what to do. You're not the boss of me now!
Is this a joke or are you actually advocating genocide?
Overall, very good, there's just a few concepts of headshots that need to be worked on here.  First off, there's the idea of *headroom*, the space between the top of the subject's head and the top of the frame. Right now, that space is about equal with the distance between the subject's chin and the bottom of the frame, you want that space above the subject's head to be smaller, so that the subject's eyes are about a third down in the frame.  Second, you want the subject to be looking *into* the frame, in this case, place the subject on the left side of the frame, so he's looking into the empty space. That space on the left behind his head is wasted, you want to avoid that.  If you wanted to crop this, I think [this](http://imgur.com/AA5AdCE) is your photo.  Another minor thing, you've lost all of the detail in the shadows, bring those up a bit so we can start seeing some of the texture in the hair.
Thank you for indulging several of my fetishes.
Bellissard. If you've had him, you know why.
Fuck that.  However many hours you work a week, you get that shit pro-rated to benefits. Work 10 hours a week at 2 places and 30 is the cutoff?  Each place pays 1/3rd of your healthcare costs.
I remember my friends (who weren't into basketball) kept wanting me to turn the game off while they were playing the foul game and I had to keep saying "no! no! Let's just see what happens..." and then this happened!
Why does the alt key look like this?  aLT
Im white and I find your disagreement in people randomly expressing the colour of their skin disagreeable.
Wow you're totally right, since feminism doesn't cover this topic or anything. Feminism trying to break down gender norms and gender roles, and promote gender equality in the eyes of the law? NO WAY, they just want to beat kids.
I definitely agree that a match can be won or lost long before the tournament.  Ill have to read that book!
The... the voice acting...  ...*In Just Cause 2*...  \*frothing at mouth, collapses on floor*
I didn't feel I needed to even address that.  My "friend" means him OP obviously.
Haha. I'm planning on doing something similar to this with a different type of backpack style. 
Exactly. One of my favorite quotes (unfortunately uncited) is, "When Science asks Nature a question, Nature replies with either 'maybe,' or 'no.'" 
I doubt it. That part of the world is pretty well known for attacking women like that. They think a woman's beauty is all she has, so they take that away from her. It's fucked up. 
Google says it takes 4 1/2 hours in current (7pm) traffic. Add a couple hours to that just in case. Leave by 7am. 
But guns are legal 
Yeah, right now I'm waiting for the bone to fill in the gap, after thats done I'll be fine to start walking again. The doctor says it should fill in by late september. 
A potent speech, I could feel his undoing begin. He was one of my favourite characters and I had suspected he was the real Azor Ahai. I am hoping he survives his wounds and makes it into the next book
That's cute. "Only my room mates/close friends/random class mates saw me yesterday? Same clothes it is"
&gt; Melkor before him in Angband made vast technological developments which really hurt people, like the development of dragons.  Wait, dragons were *created*? By Melkor?
My cast iron skillet. $24 and it'll last a lifetime. 
Why not a sentry gun
I missed the playoffs last year by losing by 0.2.  I might steal this idea.
When he's born and the slowed main theme of the movie kicks in its like "That baby is Superman", I was teary eyed, good job I had 3D glasses on.
It's a bot that re-posts the tweet so that people who are using a computer that blocks Twitter can read it.
H&amp;F Burger.  Amazing.
To continue on the bike thread, a good pair of shorts/bibs.
Just by looking at him, he's clearly one of those desperate sex-starved teenagers. I'm not surprised he turned to rape. He probably went for children only because it's much easier then fighting an older women who would know something's wrong so much earlier. 
which barrel manufacturer are you going with for the Tula? Bluejack?
Serotta hasn't been "Serotta" in quite sometime. There was an article on one of the news sites today saying Ben was going to start a new brand soon. 
I'm on level 4 right now, and it's pretty straightforward so far.
You can still find fairly good sized lobbies. I still play on my xbox every so often and have no problems finding public matches to Join. 
Taxes are magical fairy dust in Europe?  you pay, we pay.
Rockos Tacos down in Blasdell are my favorite.
Yeah, she would bring us in the next time she's at court. 
In the most non-creepy way possible, I just want to say I love Cigaro and it got bags of chips thrown at my car once. Who are you comparing your much bigger cock to? Would love to know
IMO this D&amp;D campaign is by far the funniest out of all of them. I think the all girl compilation interacting with Neal is hilarious. The chat is incredible, especially with Pimperneal pictures.
Nope. It may be because I like any type of music, but I never had anyone criticize my choice of music (specifically K-Pop). Most people end up cool about it because I show them mainstream groups. I guess it's worse for girls since "pretty boys" in K-Pop doesn't necessarily translate as "pretty boys" in the West. For guys, a cute girl is a cute girl regardless of the music. 
You poor bastard.
I hate to be a downer, but am I the only one not paying attention to this believing Arsenal just won't spend 50m on one player? I for one have faith in Giroud and I think he'll surprise us all this coming season.
Repost here is the Original, made by yours truly. http://gifsound.com/?gif=http%3A%2F%2Fs3-ec.buzzfed.com%2Fstatic%2Fenhanced%2Fwebdr03%2F2012%2F11%2F18%2F18%2Fanigif_enhanced-buzz-19275-1353280823-4.gif&amp;sound=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.youtube.com%2Fwatch%3Fv%3D86szAO0OD1g&amp;start=4
Or they could take the realistic approach and have your plane flip over.  Or the air frame shudders to a confetti of wood and metal frame.
I went on 7 once and I think everyone knew. However, I think everyone was too focused on the kid going into a K hole on the floor bleeding outta his nose. 
For streaming: Netflix, Cucirca, Putlocker, and probably a few others  For download: The Pirate Bay
Oh.. In that case OP needs to relax. 
He was trying to get away but some other cars boxed him in
"Yeah mom and dad, the kids don't know but we know" 
My take  https://www.dropbox.com/s/f3133pg15joqr9e/path3285-9-8.png
e puzzle parts are so shallow and mind numbingly boring I have nothing positive to say about them. There will be a gap that you need to get across, so instead of searching the environment, looking for things to use, you'll turn around and, oh, WOW, guess what? They'll be a GIANT plank of wood RIGHT THERE behind you for you to use. And you know the odd part? It looks exactly the same as every other plank of wood you used before it. Apparently there are just loads of massive planks of wood that are sturdy (not rotting or anything), look the same and are brilliant for getting across big gaps. How, uh, coincidental. And I thought that this was a survival horror game? Then why are there well placed ladders and planks of wood everywhere you go? Where the hell is the surviving? How come Joel never has to go into a house and use his brain and pull out a table or a bed or a fridge and use that to climb up somewhere? What I'm saying is there is zero innovation or invention here. Nothing even remotely unique. It's bland. It's pointless. It's totally lame. And the game never seems excited about any of it either. We clearly share different opinions and hey I'm okay with that, I respect your opinion... 
So they can pay their staff? So they can hire more staff to create better quality updates more often? So they can hire god-damn [James Hannigan](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/James_Hannigan) to help with the new music?! Pretty sure they're good reasons to rationalise giving Jagex your money.  Also Runescape's still a sandbox MMO and is anything but a WoWclone still. (If you want to get pedantic WoW is an EQclone but I'm not going to go there)  &gt;but ruined any faith their community had left.  Nope, just the people who can't handle change. There are still plenty of people who have faith in Jagex.
I second the Osprey! A bit pricey, but SO worth it! My Raptor 6 hydraulics pack was hands down one of the best accessories I've ever purchased. By far the most comfortable bag I've had the pleasure of carrying. 10/10, would buy again.
Don't take this the wrong way but  * Who are you?  * Why would anyone want to make a logo for you?  * Because you probably didn't like the phrasing above, what incentive are you offering?
We'll see.
Some of us are not religious. There is nothing that prevents an atheist from believing in a religion, so long as that religion doesn't promote a god.
Home schooling  should be child abuse unless the kid has some kind of disease or disability that prevents them from going to school.  
Oh really? Where in St. Maarten? I lived there for a year.
Does martini count as a mixed drink? You can easily taste the difference between good and bad gin in a martini.
4 days notice? I can't even get time off of work without a week notice.  Who plans this shit?
BOO, YOU WHORE. 
You realize I'm her boyfriend?
Being awesome and /r/Dota2 don't mix, don't you know.
http://youtu.be/bo9v0UpJe0c
Wow. What a boring life you live.
37? He's 37!?!?!
Wireless mouse and keybord for my laptop.   I can play games so much easier and I can hook up my computer to my tv and still be able to use it.
I had one blow off my head while hiking in Arches NP.  It went off a moderately sized cliff (100 ft or so) and I figured it was a lost cause.  A few months later, I got a call from a guy in Colorado who found my hat when he actually went down after his. Three months of summer sun beating down on it, blowing sand, etc.  It looked like nothing had happened to it.  My only regret is that I didn't get the one with the mesh around the crown.  Can be a little warm.
Seems a bit Daft Punk'd.
In Milford (don't know how far out you are living, or if it is even in this direction of boston) there is a great store. Most people are friendly and there is good competition
Bait and switch sounds like it would fit, if not it would be straight up fraud.
What about Doubront, De la Rosa, Workman, Matt Barnes? they have a a lot of up and coming prospects. after this year they will need a first baseman and i feel another corner outfielder.
BARK BARK BARK..  BARK BARK FUCK YOU BARK
One of the first games I played all the way through. Epic times. Grats to her.
TIL! Thanks!
&gt; There is only one God. The Trinity.   That's not what he said.. :) .. which triggered my interest.
You can also look into the mini itx or micro atx form factors. Not as upgradeable as atx, but much more portable. I never use my laptop in class, except for last minute programming (CS student checking in).
Gayted community
we... we... we have... a... lead?
I am less upset with the girl and more upset with the tattoo artist...
*Cimmanon
This video is posted in two different subreddits and both top comments are about makeing it rain on the kid. How does that make you feel.
Thanks for the testing on the redstone.  Sounds like groups are broken.   https://github.com/gmlaxfanatic/ItemExchange/issues/66
What happens when he attempts that one PAT during his heisman year?
Streaming the Game and on a Conference Call.  IT CAN BE DONE.
His bean isn't too slender 
Cats actually don't menstruate, they're induced ovulators.
What if you have no carpets at all?
The purpose of university is to learn something and to get a paper that certifies you really learned that something. Trying to get the piece of paper while minimising the amount of effort you put in learning is the very definition of gaming the system.   &gt; Though obviously you will find people in all countries that game the system, that doesn't mean that it is not more prevalent in some countries.  That is correct. I'm just saying that from what I've seen the difference is not big enough to be obvious so I'm not eager to jump to conclusions. 
iolite vaporizer.. got it for $140 but I've easily saved that much from not wasting any bud. If I vape a once or twice a day, I can make an eighth last about a month. Try doing that with a bowl :)
NO  NEVER
One of my friends got turned down for McDonalds a few years ago because he was "overqualified" and had plans for uni. Would probably be the same for OP.
I wish.   So I go to a private school, where most kids who attend live across Michigan and tend to be quite wealthy, and thusly go on vacations and such. Not I.   Most of my friends from school were seniors last year, and have graduated and gone on to Summer sessions at their colleges. Those of my friends who are of my age are either on great vacations, or doing something fun like volunteering.   I don't have a car, and can't drive, and my parents can't afford to send me on trips or the like, but they work from 7/8- 6pm.   In the past, I spent my time on games like Maplestory or others where I could meet people and just have someone to make me feel like I wasn't alone 24/7. I've tried going outside,  ~~but the graphics suck~~ there aren't any kids my age in my subdivision. I've spent quite sometime searching.  Hope that sheds some light.
Yeah that works. What works better is if you have a side button on your mouse. I had a mouse with 2 side buttons, one for taunt and other one for laugh :3
Being in australia, i assume there are some fun dirt roads. Have you ever been interested in All wheel drive turbo cars for their intrinsic Rooster tailing? Specifically Galant Vr4 (AWD, AWS, turbo, 4 door).  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=W5PBBgkov1c  At one point i was trying to develop a cheap ecig that was reusable. Once wicked E-liquid started making their line of tank fed models, i pretty much surrendered. I was R/Ding on a slave wage budget and those started becoming ever more superior.  I think now i might concentrate on developing my novelty gun accessories in my parents basement. Joking, no basements in florida, just sticky garages.
true, however when was the last time Kimi had a fast qualifying car? he's undoubtedly fast, maybe not as raw as Hamilton, vettel, or alonso, but I think that if he was in a Merc or RB, he would definitely see some front line starts.  
There is a good chance that if you could prove it was your book that the campus book store would give this back. Also, Police can be very persuasive if you wouldn't mind filing a report.
I don't own a Roku, so I'm not exactly sure. But I outlined pretty clearly in the OP the advantage of it acting as a mediator rather than a standalone solution.
This is fucking awesome
Another fun bit I found, apparently MDMA is tested for now under DOT standards, [Doesn't mean that every company tests in the same way though.](http://www.erowid.org/psychoactives/testing/testing_usdot_2010.pdf)
the would you rather says that you find attractive lol...
sorry i like tangible things that i haven't torrented.  
You sir are awesome. 
No exceptions. Ever.
http://i.imgur.com/77C2t.gif
What if that dream is to be a eunuch?
I suppose this is mine: http://imgur.com/GlQX8u2  MSIA Heavyarms Custom to scale 
Not very helpful. But thanks anyway.
Well written article - will keep an eye on the column in the future.
/r/gullsgonewild camgirl
Why would you say something like that!?! 
Fibonacci sequence!! 
"Why couldn't he just put the bunny back in the box" Pinnacle of acting right here.
I'll find you and kill you right before you mount Aeonaxx. &lt;3
Yeah but AD on Netflix was like the worst thing I ever watched. That season sucked hard.
Hey, he's only mediocre.
The Israeli right just kicked the ultra orthodox out of the majority.  Try again.
Don't tell me what it's about!
I worked in a large chemical plant for almost a year and there were miles of rail in the plant. Whenever anyone had to do work near the tracks, you would have to get the proper Safe Work Permit. The head operator of the plant would make sure there would be no rail delivers that day, but to be safe, the plant rail-crew would have to come in to install a safety derailer an x-number of feet before where the work has to be done. After the work is completed, you close out the permit and the rail-crew comes in and removes the derailer. 
I'll be right over! That's awesome.
In Ireland, yes.
"There's no way I was going to stop"  Yeah, driving recklessly and not paying attention to traffic will do that. 
The bong is blockin the tv mang.
She probably deflates her ass after a long day of twerking. 
Upgraded from the logitech Z2300. I'm amazed at what a difference it is! I decided to get them mainly on the recommendations and buzz about them from around this subreddit.  My home theater downstairs is still using a sony HTIAB, but I figured since I still live in an apartment and listen to music way more than I watch movies that my desktop situation could be upgraded first.  These things are great! I'm a bit worried about pissing off the neighbors so I haven't really cranked into them as much as I'd like.. but my first impressions with their bass output made me burst out laughing.. I was not expecting such nice bass from a 2.0 bookshelf setup. Only downside is that I don't have room for my extra monitors if I want to keep proper speaker placement (I still need some stands). 
Wear them!
I'd get it, it's good enough for $40 game. The big stuff is fixed, and its not worth stressing over the minor things. 
...what?
Semper Fi, Do or die. I salute you sir.
Man I hope these are the worst parts of the movie, and that this trailer isn't "all of the funny stuff", you know?
If my geometry teacher used him to teach me about trapezoids maybe I'd get an irregular shape once in a while if you know what I mean
If you have an iphone (not sure about android) download the app SeatGeek. It does a WONDERFUL job of compiling all reputable web sites that have ticket sales into one interface. Its an awesome app.  edit* Didn't even know until now, but they have a website. Check them out.   http://seatgeek.com/san-francisco-49ers-tickets/
Luckily for the cat, YOLNT.
YES! everyone in my fucking group has to say it like we all wont see it 30 times tonight. 
As if Buttman is much better
What were the changes?
No idea, never met the dude personally, this was from another base
No, no. We fart and burp and whatnot the same amount as men. It's just not as socially acceptable.
Sounds interesting, I'll have to look into it.   Thank you.
&gt;Evil Ranga has been deposed  They said the same thing 3 years ago about KRudd and now that zombie is back.   
Easy there. Thats a very offensive thing to say to someone.
Tread is way to big but Eh... Bram Stoker's Dracula. Beautifully filmed, classic story, amazing acting from Gary Oldman and the design of Dracula was is classic. Then we have Keanu Reeves and Winona Ryder who kill every emotion this movie was trying to make. 
&gt; Fist of all: I think it is madness (if not impossible) to make movie adaptations of Tolkien's books that stay true to the essence and nature of Tolkien, therefore this should never be expected by fans of his works.  I disagree; certainly it is possible to make excellent films that are more true to Tolkien's work than Jackson's. Indeed, in many ways Ralph Bakshi's much-maligned version was truer to Tolkien, despite its obvious other flaws.  Really, there's nothing *that* special about Tolkien's themes; they are commonplace in many films. They may tend to be neglected in action-adventure films, but then, *The Lord of the Rings* is not an action-adventure novel.  &gt; I think the movies of LotR are the best movies ever made.  That's an awfully high standard to hold them to. As adaptations, they are terrible, and even if you can somehow forget the source material, they're not, IMHO, particularly good *as films*. They have their good points — the look and feel, and the score, and some of the casting — but I can think of lots better films, even within the genre.
170? That loch ness monster said tree fity
Is that Dublin Ohio?
It would be stupid to not call the popo.
My prediction. Will never see front page. 
I support Red Bulls in MLS and City in EPL. Other then that, I have no more favorites. One of my best friends is a Milan supporter :D
Wow! Same with my fiance's parents, except for the hooker part, his mom (Thai) worked on a military base and met her future husband there. They are divorced now because she started developing a gambling addiction.  Yes you have a lot of time. I have to go during Songkran (Thai new year), where everyone is doused with water. No one is safe. :D
Me to Oxrly, me too
Ok, so you are just a full on fascist. Gotcha.
May I come to your town? FC in flair. Will tip!
Noxian Xin Xiao, Garen, and Jarven. Demacian Katarina, Darius, and Draven. 
What a welcoming subreddit this is.
Some people seriously think some undead shit is going to go down so I wouldn't say thats a great idea...  I remember one time I went into a burger king and saw 3 guys in camo pants and shirts on that say "Zombie Survival Squad" or something to that effect, I said "I like your shirts". I talked to them for a minute and told them I really love zombie games and movies and the older guy was like "We hunt zombies for real" and all of them looked at me seriously.  Yeah, I just said an awkward "...ok" and thankfully my food came so I could go. There are some crazy fucks out there.
&gt; You are also a bane on our people   None of this.  Thanks.
Rice Cooker....best 30 bucks ever. Almost 10 years old and still makes perfect rice everytime....(unless you push the warm button instead of cook)
shameless plug for /r/DailyDouble
Both! Visiting the third-party sites is part of my responsibilities as a member of our team that helps with Social Media, and I've also been a redditor for several years through my own personal account. We got to thinking awhile back, *'Why not chat it up on those sites where players talk about our games?'*, and I think it's worked out pretty well so far. By chatting on sites like reddit, we can quickly respond to new issues that come up and give players another avenue to reach us when the unexpected comes up :) 
I heard things like that too, but I don't think that any matte display should have colors reproduction problems
vonnegut
You need to know.  He said it.  You NEED to know.  EVERYONE should be saying what you said.  Why hasn't /r/politics let this see the light of day?  How can anyone conclude anything other than... this is a JOB KILLER?  Seriously.  Post this information on OTHER threads about the economy and see what happens.  There are other links.  When another Redditor asked me for a source and I posted another one... I got ZERO response from that Redditor even though I know that Redditor has been posting.
At the moment it's [Scale The Summit - Atlas Novus](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Q0kUpcCSzn8)
thanks pal :)
Give me your email I will send you pics
:C purple link
One of the people it ran over is Amendola's dad!
Ehh no, not really
Yeah his gym has that picture. I went there recently.  I'll post it up. 
I guess freakish is a bit of a stretch... was just trying to describe the Russian's perspective.
Holy shit Gene Wilder is old, like not age wise, as soon as he started talking about swearing I fucking lost it...
Ah, the ultimate walk of shame. Walking through Home Depot with only a plunger. 
Uuhhh guys am I listening to the right game?! Hits! Runs! Rookies kicking butt! I think all the Pill flair is working!
Send the CEO to prison.  He chose, or had influence over the insurance policy of the company, he chose, or had influence over the operating procedures. Set the precedent. Federal Justice Ministry NEEDS to make this into case law. 
Aristobia Horridula - thanks for helping me solve this one!  [cheesy video of the beetle found on youtube](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-0weLIx1-_o)
Cool, thanks.
Yup. RANDNSFW sure is a weird place.
The response is flawed (and obviously biased). You can't factor in the payroll expenses of the franchises and NOT also include their revenue. Neither factors were in the original argument.
I go there for Linux iso's only!!
I've heard this argument before and it doesn't make me any less uncomfortable.  I thought the character art in muramasa and Odin sphere were the perfect balance of classy and sexy. This just feels... creepy.
this is kind of me, and i have felt this way in the past, the reason being that i know i and probably a lot of women, we grow up with a lot more female relationships than male relationships, when i was younger boys were always a bit of a mystery to me, going out with them, having sex with them, there's always a bit lost in translation, a bit of a hurdle. but girls? i've had some of my girlfriends since first grade i get them much more easily and especially when i was younger i found them much more relatable.   as a bisexual person, it was easier for me to just act straight, cause why not? i'm not going to have a big dramatic, tearful coming out to my grandparents  and then go date a boy. i like girls in general but i'm not promiscuous by my nature and i've never met a lady who i clicked with in a way that made me think "girlfriend material". so it never came up and it's not something that i feel the need to flaunt, but that doesn't mean it's off the table!  but a few years down the road, if i break up with my boyfriend i could very well see myself looking back over my relationships and being like, "i should try dating women" and maybe it would be a good thing for me!  nonetheless, if you "suck at dating guys" you probably suck at dating everyone, and need to examine more than just your sexual preference.    
That notification comes up whenever you are building that wonder in a different city in your civ.
How are you with permissions and factions? PM Me if you would like to help out. I'm having issues with my factions plugin and chat.
Being from in australia, i assume there are some fun dirt roads. Have you ever been interested in All wheel drive turbo cars for their intrinsic Rooster tailing? Specifically Galant Vr4 (AWD, AWS, turbo, 4 door).  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=W5PBBgkov1c  At one point i was trying to develop a cheap ecig that was reusable. Once wicked E-liquid started making their line of tank fed models, i pretty much surrendered. I was R/Ding on a slave wage budget and those started becoming ever more superior.  I think now i might concentrate on developing my novelty gun accessories in my parents basement. Joking, no basements in florida, just sticky garages.
[Sauce](http://www.redtube.com/283883)
maybe he is an outstanding defender, but found a market back in 2008 for his missed tackles and took the overs....
What are your first and second, out of interest? (I presume German and something)
I'm apparently quite bad at this. I found the sticker, but have no idea what I'm looking at: http://i.imgur.com/8dn8a7m.jpg  As for this 6 pin cable.. Can't seem to find one..
"Make sure your fat and funny, woman." ---Signed, Drew Carey.
ARE YOU A SPOOKY GHOST
I can't argue with that
This is like perpetual energy. Or something.
Exactly. I use a HRM and track calories burned during my workouts, and there are so many variables that will affect the number. If I work out after eating, I'll have a much higher number than if I work out fasted. How long you rest, whether you pair pushes/pulls, etc. etc. will all change the numbers. In the end, it's a pretty insignificant number of calories and not worth trying to factor it in to anything.
Also, testicular cancer is one of the more visible cancers. Any unusual lumps or bumps on your testes should be investigated. The number of men who think "It's nothing, it'll go away" and only get checked when it's far too late is horrifying and it would be so easy to save their lives if they would just have the balls to check themselves properly and ask for help.
I don't know why I upvoted this.
this belongs in /r/cringepics instead
hmmm. idk about the monacle. I'm thinking with his voice It would be more of a Debonair thing. He's like a jelly version of Barney Stinson. He's more of a bro than a gentleman.
Monsters U came much later than the original, to the point where the technological advances necessitated basically all new work. Same with Toy Story 3. Cars 2 was also new models.  But let's get something straight here: modelling is not a huge expense in animated films. The cost is in rigging, animation, texturing, lighting, writing, sound, and voicing. A lot of cost in voicing.  I can't speak to the budget bullshit in the other films, though.
[First time someone has recognised used my username for someplace else] (http://27.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_lz3gznE2Hd1qzemrio1_500.gif)
Nah...that's just about it...save the one about putting lithium in the company's water supply, affixing micro-camera lenses with super glue to not quite hidden areas where people will find them (and be freaked out), and dropping pieces of paper in the stairwells / elevators with people's names on it (with a header like "Test Subject: Bob Dickens, Subject has shown that he is beginning to accept his 'life' as an average middle class worker at Company X. Subject is responding well to aggressive psycho-reconditioning therapy, recommend for Stage 2."). Possibly moving their car using a forklift from one side of the parking lot, to the other side...so it's not where they left it, and they don't know why.   It's the little things that you think of, while you're driving home, and wondering why it seems like the traffic engineers are always working only on the roads you travel on (haha, single lanes! not fun)...or that people only obey the speed limit (not 5 MPH more than that number, but they will come to an almost complete stop, in the middle of the road, before turning onto a side road) that really help get the creative juices flowing.  
Oh I know. Believe me. As a gay person, I know.
im confused.. are you implying it was the nurses 'responsibilty' to wheel the patient out?
Sounds exciting.
&gt;I guarantee it does not give such a specific example, but w/e.  I'm not just making that up, [here's the link](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jaywalking), check for yourself  &gt;Also, I was focusing on the correct part of the quote.   No you were not, the quote was "illegal or reckless crossing of the road," you quote-mined the "reckless crossing of the road" fragment when it continued on to give examples, specifically the one I used.  &gt;It doesn't matter that it originated in the US. We know it's illegal, so what descriptor does that leave us with? Reckless.  The law for jaywalking defines specific circumstances of a pedestrian crossing the road that are illegal as well as the blanket term "reckless crossing of the road" in order to encompass more than the finite number of circumstances listed, the example I gave is one of the former.   &gt;Again, you are arguing against yourself and constructing a rare scenario ...  You *asked* me to construct a scenario, this argument stemmed from me originally claiming that just because something is against the law does not mean it is intrinsically dangerous/wrong and you challenged that, I provided an example of a illegal act (jaywalking) that is not dangerous in order to demonstrate my point.   &gt;... in order to make jaywalking seem totally safe and okay.  So it seems that you agree my circumstance is a safe instance of jaywalking?
The network I was imagining was the one at the [Utah data-center](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Utah_Data_Center).  I would imagine there is a secure data storage network(s), a less secure data analysis network(s), and separate administrative general office network.  The data is probably collected from numerous sources and fed into the secure network. Those sources are probably a mixture of operating systems and applications based off of their specific usage. The secure areas are most likely Linux, I can't image any sane experienced engineer choosing Windows for something like that.
Probably people who either timed out, disconnected, or realized it was more expensive than they thought.  You still have 2 days, so good luck!
Gimme
Great read! Give Rachel my compliments to her well-made drawings!
Your straw is a penis.
Check out Helping Up Mission. Men's live-in addiction recovery organization in E Baltimore on Baltimore Street. They need volunteers for tutoring in general last time I checked, plenty of men in there who need computer skill training.
It's a Jack Ass movie withe the real life trolling of Borat.  Fucking fantastic.  
I fall asleep to asmr videos every night now. They relax me and put my mind in a very peaceful place. Heather Feather on YouTube is one of my favorites.
is that the machine on the Z?
Best part is Striker,  the one that stayed back, HAD ranged weapons, had a chest mounted rocket launcher array. 
Your idea is bad and you should feel bad too. That is all.
Oh shit I just realized Crazy Eyes doing the "signal" to the guard to keep her out of Psych! I really need to rewatch the whole series I bet there's tons of subtle stuff like that
Hawking used defecate.   It's not very effective. 
Unfortunately, they ended up delaying the patch release. Still had maintenance time earlier, i believe, but the patch was just deployed a few minutes ago.
I usually see things like community outreach, tutor trainers, I saw a job one time for parent educators. There are also ESL jobs and, like I said, GED jobs, that are through non-profits. See if there's a non-profit job board and then put "education" into the search and see what comes up, I bet you'll find a lot of things! Also, have you been to indeed.com? It's like a job board aggregate. If you just type in "education", it searches all job boards in the area, including company websites. Good luck!
Drop the "I like you" and just casually invite her to get a drink after work. 
Yeah, he isn't the most athletic looking fella.. 
I want to have that job title one day. Internet Historian.
My fave is the guy panhandling with about a grand worth of hardware pierced through his face.
I went to sugarhouse cause they were offering $100 in free slot play.  Of course there were a ton of catches and they expected people to come lose more money etc.  I got down to $80, won $60.  Up $40 I said thanks for the free drinks and the $40 and left.  Wasn't bad actually.  They gave me a free Phillies pennant too.
68214
Various Android/Nexus communities..not personal follows
I was enlisted with king harlous (floris) and it was the entire Nordic force v.s. About 300 khergits
[intro](http://www.reddit.com/r/Random_Acts_Of_Amazon/comments/1ibbs0/intro_oh_my_glob_this_place_is_great/)  [teehee](http://www.amazon.com/Truck-Sorry-Offroad-Bumper-Sticker/dp/B001NQQ9VY/ref=wl_it_dp_o_pC_nS_nC?ie=UTF8&amp;colid=1F9R74OEZ5ITT&amp;coliid=I2H3Q3JX3465QF) it makes me giggle. :)  sexy rexy
I can relate to this so much. I left my last job because the politics were so ridiculous that what ought to have been a cushy secretarial position resulted in me undergoing a total mental breakdown. I really don't understand why people get so invested in their jobs that they turn their workplaces into zones of terror and oppression. What are you dealing with right now/want to rant about it?
Cool, omw to watch wolverine then I'll be responding to everyone =]
They won't ask.
Yes Hudson, Mi gets a lip of dip early so I'm expecting it to be there when I go. 
Official stream with swedish "expert desk" and HellspawN doing interviews over in Seattle.
dat horses ass. 
Argh, waterbending???? I'm totally a Firebending lover. &gt;:(  At least it's not Earthbending.
Dude, that remix is Sikh!
Just use the tor browser bundle and shout "I am sparticus" 
Depends on the mod.  Not with Misery, or at the very least not with V2.
that's quite a big soft cock. Would love to see it hard
Check out the Children's Museum and the Zoo.  My 2y/o loves them both.  If you're up for a drive, the Butteryfly Pavilion is a bit north of the city and also a big hit with the kids.
Didn't some one do this two days ago?
Anything for Dark Arisen?  http://www.reddit.com/r/gameswap/comments/1iwcmn/usa_h_metro_last_light_injustice_xcom_others_360/
OMG, Doublelift is me
Yeah.... no.
Nate the Nugget!
I really like this.  And I don't even like blondes. 
I don't personally like the _ayden. I was however going to name my first son Aiden. (That is if I have a child)
It definitely looks to me like it took up a decent dye even if its not as intense as you want. Bright colors can sometimes be difficult to achieve the desired intensity. If all else fails, Arda has two different hot pink shades in their wig collections. 
I didn't see this particular comment on the live feeds, but they were just in the HOH a little big ago joking around, maybe it was then. Elissa and Andy were cracking jokes back and forth and occasionally Helen and Aaryn joined in. Elissa even complimented Aaryn a few times. 
The Black Pearl was a ship built on top of a steel barge.  Source: My father oversaw the building of it.
He'll be in the first 5 episodes of the new season but he's leaving to focus on his rap career. 
How insensitive...they didn't bring a "get well soon" balloon.
Fuck, that almost made me throw up. First thing that made me cringe in a long time.
How strong is the culture in China to haggle over the price of things? It has to be strong, right? I ask because I used to work in a convenience store near where a lot of Chinese immigrants lived. If a Chinese guy brought two gallons of milk to the register, as opposed to the ordinary one gallon, he would try to get a price reduction. When I said no, he'd say something like now my kids will not be able to eat this week. How prevalent is that kind of stuff?
Ok, imagine climbing a ladder. Basically do with the hooks what you'd do with your hands.
He knocked her out? What is this Scooby-Doo? 
On my first build i didn't even wait for a case, just set it up as a test bench and booted. It didn't work at first though, i couldnt install windows due to bad hard drive my friend gave me.
How much would a poster sell for?  I like what I see here.
Secondhand shopping at thrift, consignment, goodwill, ebay used, or craigslist are good ways to curb any further support to sweatshops. I get most of my clothes, among other items I want, secocndhand. (though I've been hearing some nasty things about goodwill lately and how they way underpay their employees with disabilities and take advantage of them)
&gt; But you are the pattern.  I still wonder about the duplicate me - and what if I'm destroyed and then two copies of me are created simultaneously?  &gt; And it seems, at least, that there will be a person causally connected to a fungible instance of your pattern who lives 10**30 years.  How are we to determine that this physics of personness is any better than, for example, one which states that when we are totally unconsciousness that ends our point-of-view, and a new one not ultimately related to the other is created when we regain consciousness? That rather than being "immortal" we're not even as mortal as we normally imagine.  (I feel like I'm in a maze but should really be able to climb on top of the walls and just can't do it yet - this is probably a useful discussion for *me* at any rate even if I'm failing to CYV.)
&gt; Im pretty sure that means there were a total of 3 black people there.  Yes. So he didn't think he'd get caught when he said it to a black security guard.
Ive been away from the scene for a while now have any of those documentaries or any cool videos come out in the past year or two?
That was strangely satisfying
I dont know how people can live with doing the bare minimum 
Yeah, instead of one 30-minute episode we made over an hour and broke it up.  One remaining.
[Heres a link!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6HrXn12LmqM)  in the video, the setting on fire ability is not shown as it is on town and the zombies are already on fire.
That ias roll kills it. The target audience for these would be a cm wiz, and they're going to require 9 ias on the gloves.   Also, it has no defensive roll outside of the vit. Would be worth something with higher ias, and either str/ar/arm
he's made 2 good albums, 1 decent, 0 classic... He is FAR from the best singer, maybe second best in modern rnb, thats all you can give him. God im tired of blind followers, but i guess music reaches far too wide an audience to avoid ignorance
When he's trying to kiss ass.
sounds absolutely demonic, like the kind of suffering Dante described in hell.
Not the NSA directly, but Tor is the other often cited poster child of government sponsored open source security tools.
I will definitely agree with you. I can say that going through something like that will be stressful, but most of us know in our mind that it is seriously a game. I wouldn't say that it would be necessarily easier for them, but they sort of have a clue about what to expect. The thing that gets me is the DI's. I'm not sure how they are, but I have seen some videos on it...and I can imagine that they scale back some for the public videos. 
You mean increase productivity which in turn increases the standard of living? Any technology that can lessen the need for people is a plus. Gives us more time to focus on more important things than serving food.
I'm guessing that means you have 15mbps from comcast eh?
Would you like to me to re-list each charge with a description?
I'll change that.
Ain't it the truth
Love it, could we get a download?
The money for an executive membership is totally worth it as long as you spend about 500  a month there.  That it's the best $110 I ever spent.
Even the U plays in front of empty stadiums a lot.
Thank *you* for the trades.  And yes, I will definitely post to your reference today. :)
Try restarting your router
Oh look, more lowest common denominator bullshit.  At this point I don't think it's a question *if* Reddit has jumped the shark, more like *how many times* it's jumped the shark.
C.C. x pizza delivery guy. They have such chemistry.
I'm curious why you're fixating on this point though. It's not support at all for my argument of why you were wrong, i was trying to compliment you to make the post less harsh, it was just done a bit inaccurately. 
They are also limited to part time hours. In my eyes, any grown-ass person who is whining that they need to be paid more money but won't go get a REAL job with full time hours and opportunity for advancement (especially in NYC where we NEED cooks) is L-A-Z-Y.
I think this technology could easily be developed to control cyborgs.
Microsoft Security Essentials or MSSE. It is the best on Windows from a resource point of view and is quite efficient. 
"I was at the edge of my seat, filled with anticipation and excitement. [The trade deadline] did not disappoint." -Miguel "I don't understand the hype around Daft Punk" Cabrera
I don't wanna be that guy, but do you guys know how to do a jump attack in dark souls? 
Damn, nice detective work.
Hey Chance. I love your music bro! I know kanye has been a big influence on you and I was wondering. Which artists have influenced you the most growing up? and also which artists are you currently listening to?
Not until a psychiatrist can confirm. 
I said nothing about absolute free speech. I understand what libel and slander are. However there is absolutely nothing wrong with hate speech. Saying you hate something is perfectly fine.
I think that's required on cars sold here in Sweden.
T_T well, I was going to be called Mercedes, and this was the reason why. Awfully glad my mum put her foot down on this.
You had one job
I think many as me bought the console becuse we knew we would own one so why not buy one now even if ther are no games. But yes maybe many are w8 fore games too come. But then thy maybe buy ps3 xbox when those consoles gets games ?
He hopes he can get his penis inside her.  mostly.
Agreed, Shure SE215s are incredibly accurate. They also are perfect when exercising.   However, heed the warning of /u/ohshitgorillas :  &gt;Don't wear isolation headphones when you're riding your bike. It's extremely dangerous.
Alright I guess I'll check it out if you say it's good lol
PORK CHOP SANDWICHES!
Spayed not neutored. 
why do you redditors always have to let it be known that you *lost it*?
&gt; "The enemy of my enemy is my enemy's enemy, nothing more."  I agree.  It's disturbing for atheists to make common cause with christian islamophobes.  I've seen Dinesh D'Sousa try (and get away with) this in debates.  He'll make some slam against Muslims and get his Atheist debate partner (in this case, Hitchens) to go along with it. It's ridiculous.  Ayaan Hirsi Ali is an out Atheist, but because she's so virulently anti-muslim (and I don't blame her), she finds a nice home at the conservative, not-at-all-atheist American Enterprise Institute (which I do kind of blame her for).  It does feel  ridiculous, as an Atheist, having to stick for the absurdity of Islam.  I just have to remember that what I'm doing is not favoring or supporting Islam *per se*.  I am merely denying the majoritarian religion from picking on the minority religion.
I remember when Ansett crashed and burned. 
I check out /r/Culture once a week or so.
ooh, that's a good one
Oh my god.  That honk after it landed was fucking funny.
I'm pretty sure the number one use for wormholes is to transport into the Vita, isn't it?
1. 5:23  2. 5:37  3. 5:51  4. 6:15  [Thissss](http://www.amazon.com/niceEshop-Women-Balloon-Pendant-Necklace-Gold/dp/B00DMWQOGC/ref=wl_it_dp_o_pC_nS_nC?ie=UTF8&amp;colid=331PBQKX40X&amp;coliid=I3RIKNIFO08QM2)
Gotcha
I am a YCS/WCQ level judge. Self Destruct Button decks are perfectly legal. There is no such thing as a deck needing a win condition. Furthermore, a match only ends when you have two wins or two losses, so if you keep drawing, you keep starting another game until time is called, at which point highest wins wins.  Ignore all the other comments. 
As a 10 year plus "mac guy," I really liked windows 7. 
Lost. I watched it in real time--week to week, season to season. I kept up on the online forums and the amazing theories that came out of them. There was a gaping hole in my world when it finally ended. The mysteries were better than the answers, but the journey was more epic than any other show I've watched.
Can we stop with this now until its official. The amount of Bale posts is riddiuclous. We get it, Real want to offer a shit ton of money for some reason. We dont need a new article everyday telling us Perez is losing his mind.
well,I know a little, and tiger_lily_x3 has done a couple different designs for people.  I think I'm reading this... not sure, am I even here.. idk. are any of us here.  no such thing. business cards are an extension of the person or business behind the card. some are simple some are not. I do not know what kind of card you are looking to do but we should be able to figure it out :-)
I mean that at least half of our success is dependant on others. Specifically, how we interact with them. If we have good social skills, we will have better relationships with people we encounter. Naturally, those that care about us will support us as we pursue our goals, as we will theirs.   For example, a student in college who has good relationships with his professors and fellow students will find support and resources in them. They will help him with his learning goals.  There are many ways to build social skills. The best is to find something that you are a little bit uncomfortable with (like having a conversation with a stranger at the bus stop) and practice, practice, practice. The key to getting better is to find where you are a bit uncomfortable and put yourself out there. It's the only way to get better.  Also, try r/socialskills
Yeah, I've had the black one for a couple weeks now and I noticed the black wearing off. Might get a wrap, but with the grooves I'm not sure how it will turn out. Maybe a plastidip? Though I don't know the first thing to do with it.
she is anti stick and she doesnt want a 4-door....the first thing i suggest was the MS3 and she shot it down
My grandfather was a member of the Capital ß.
I couldn't say on that question, they both perform fairly similarly, the A161p's might be slightly more neutral sounding with a little less high end.  In the $150-175 range, I'd say look at a pricier HiFi Man like the RE262's, or another one that I've never heard personally but have gotten a lot of praise are the Vsonic Gr07's.
Ah, I see.  I am disappoint.  Thanks for he heads up.
Debbie fancied you.
no problem, when you are ready for online maybe I will be too. Shoot me a PM so we can play horribly together
I was with you until the Slurpee thing. Slurpees are far and away different from other frozen flavoured drinks. The only ones that compare are Icees. Other shit like Slushies and Frazil are nowhere near the same.
I really did.... 
Do we really need a title like this, *do we really?*
WHY DIDN'T SHE RUN SIDEWAYS!?
I'm watching the clock
I can't speak for the other Greek organizations from my campus; but I can say that my campus is extremely gay friendly so I doubt there would be much problem among other organizations....
How much was it on steam?  I thought it was 13.99 at both?
If the Yankees are still on the hook for his contract then it's bullshit
he got hit by the ball, didn't he? wouldn't that be an automatic out?
From the depths of one of my mom's household tool buying binges. Never was used, was just laying around. It holds heat incredibly well.
I was just talking about C.
Yeah? Are you going to try to make some sense out of that shit question? The dawn of time? Seriously? What person would have been keeping what from what person at the dawn of time? 
I go through these quickly, but only because they are fantastic for removing pet hair from furniture and car seats! 
How does that solve the problem? Let's say that we all agree that this business practice is unethical, and we all take your advice.   We bankrupt McDonald's, and all of these people are unemployed. Not really a solution. 
You really, really, really should be going with LGA2011 for such a high-end build. And I'd also recommend a good mechanical keyboard from Corsair, Cooler Master, or Ducky, but that's personal preference.
Paying $200+ in tuition twice does nothing for anyone. 
Its cool everyone settle down
Perfect for cleaning!
use a design template based upon some other military's ID  format, it will still look military without being close enough to be a risk
You'd be surprised at the petty shit some people will pitch a fit over.
Do I have a choice? If I'm in the arena, then I'm participating. The question is if I will try to survive. And the answer is yes.
Obligatory finnish "lol who pays for education" comment. 
Yep. I'd never admit it to anyone IRL because they get worried that I'm comparing myself to other people and putting myself down, but I'd be lying if I pretended this wasn't one of the reasons I want to be fitter and stronger. I want to be just as hot as the girls I see on my campus every day.
You're pretty
Powerpoint is a great way to put kids to sleep.  Better than a hangover and tylenol PM combined.  *Source: former lab instructor
Not a whole brain cell or full set of teeth in that gang.
One of my friends said this today:  'what? :O But he can't get mad *at a girl?'*  Yes he can. That's ridiculous. 
Saw Enemy at the Gates huh?
Wouldn't do this if you own a cat. 
If you're going to split hairs about training "hard" vs. "smart" I'll remind you that if a student doesn't show up to class, they're not training _at all_.  The distinction you're making is what I call "style" vs. "system" (terms I made up) -- the style is the mechanics of whatever movements, the system is how that knowledge is passed. I've known a number of excellent martial artists who can't teach for shit, and a number of excellent teachers who weren't particularly stellar martial artists.  "Fighter, Not Art" being a fallacy, that's just nonsense. If that were the case I could walk in to any school, get the magic pixie dust sprinkled on me, and because it's the system and not me, I'd go from zero-to-hero in no time flat. You can't possibly believe that.  We could legitimately argue which system imparts useful skills most quickly, thus being the "most smart." My vote goes to Krav Maga... certainly not wing chun, which is glacially slow in comparison.  We could also argue over which style has produced the greatest fighters (when they were at the pinnacle of their ability, blah, blah, blah). That's unknowable.
Heat death of the universe.
if its very firm no, otherwise for god sake yes! take a pin to the head
174
MCS hype...Who let the dogs out!
Shit in the box and put it on his bed!
Haha I have that book too! My sister bought it for me for my birthday. It also has Uncial, Carolingian, and Foundational guidelines which, luckily for me, are the three scripts that I'm most interested in.
I just run a man converge out of 3 4 and play as a linebacker and make sure I never bite on the rb. I take qb or qb to second rb option. That seems to work well enough to pull out a W, but they still are getting 100 yards or so. But I hate heavy blitzing or run heavy packages due to my much worse pass coverage. 
At first, I didn't have a problem with them, but I feel like in the past year or so I've been on /r/nosleep, there weren't millions of stories with 5-10 updates like there are now. It's grating, to say the least. I don't want to have to read through half a dozen super long updates for one story, it just ends up being stupid in the end to me. A fantastic one-off story that draws me in is worth way more than something you have to write an update to every three hours to keep people's attention, you know?
Guis srsly.
The stats are really nice, but as said, it doesn't have the armor/AR that would make it a $250 item.  I would argue that gloves needs to have 9ias to make it $250 because breakpoints are so important for wizards. This is compounded by the fact that godly gloves are craftable.  It's hard to judge the other gloves based on how much more/less dmg it gives your character because the damage you see on screen really depends on the stats of your char.  Having that said, RMAH seems the way to go. You'll just need to be patient.
that's why I use them, to destroy equipment through walls
I agree with the fact that in order to innovate you must take risks, but that is different from writing a hard book you know your kids can't write. Drumlines are set in the winter, if you don't have a good grasp on what your kids can play I think it's time for new staff. 
Not really. Just go back to BF2 and make more classes, or keep with 4 and only give engineers SMGs and no pistol. No anti-tank class fully capable of competing with all the other classes at the anti-infantry role. 
Damnit, manslayer...
In Yiddish it's schmeckle.
Spotify. 10 bucks a month, add about 50 songs a month, and get close to 1000 hours of use out of it in that month.
Benis Mightier, To Hell in a Hank Baskett, Jacquizz in my Pants
And Nicholas Cage literally didn't affect the outcome of anything. All of the natural disasters still happened. Him discovering the "list" served 0 purpose overall, even though it was the entire premise of the movie.
Is this how the GoPro was invented?
*sigh*, ya just don't get it, do you?
I would just fap right onto that note if I were that kid
While bladefurying, jugger can attack units as long as they are not affected by it (bladefury).
Take note gentlemen, this is how you dress. Properly Done!
You need one to make high quality oil
Thanks!
Nothing, because everybody knows that anything can happen in the WWE.
 This link appears to have been removed from /r/worldnews by either the spam filter or moderators.  ---  [Despite a national shortage, celebs are using nutritional drugs that premature infants need for survival.](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/1jfv2t/despite_a_national_shortage_celebs_are_using/)  submitted 4 hours ago by: [Intermeister](/user/Intermeister) to [worldnews](/r/worldnews)  ---  **[Confirm it's missing](/r/worldnews/search?q="Despite%20a%20national%20shortage%2C%20celebs%20are%20using%20nutritional%20drugs%20that%20premature%20infants%20need%20for%20survival."&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on)** | **[Message the moderators about this removal](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/worldnews&amp;subject=Why%20was%20this%20removed%20from%20/r/worldnews%3F%3A%20Despite%20a%20national%20shortage%2C%20celebs%20are%20using%20nutritional%20drugs%20that%20premature%20infants%20need%20for%20survival.&amp;message=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/1jfv2t/despite_a_national_shortage_celebs_are_using/)** | **[Post to PoliticalModeration](/r/PoliticalModeration/submit?title=/r/worldnews%20%5Bremoved%5D%20Despite%20a%20national%20shortage%2C%20celebs%20are%20using%20nutritional%20drugs%20that%20premature%20infants%20need%20for%20survival.&amp;url=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/1jfv2t/despite_a_national_shortage_celebs_are_using/)**   |     |  | |     |  | ------------|-----|-|-----------|-----| created: |  July 31, 2013 7:14 p.m. | |score:  |  0 | first seen: |  July 31, 2013 7:12 p.m. | |upvotes:   |  4 | last seen:  |  July 31, 2013 11:23 p.m. | |downvotes: |  5 | missing: |  July 31, 2013 11:58 p.m. | |comments:  |  2 |
Luckily (?) for OP, 5702  is for warrant officers, and I've never known a 5702  that wasn't miserable   Anyway have fun in the peace time  Marine Corps, op. Dahahahaha
Rule 1.  Again.  You're not good at this.
Go to the secret pizza parlor in The Cosmopolitan! 
&gt; This is not a logical decision you make, it's a natural response.  Precisely my point. Something outside the realm of logic or rationality is not rational. It's arational.   &gt; It's not "irrational" in any way to 'want to continue living'. It's the core principle of life.   True. But it is irrational to continue living when you know there's no rational reason to do so.
Always release order.
The slider isnt themed by ayecon for some reason.
Eh, it's happened in that arcade before.  The guy that owns it actually seems to pretend to give a crap every once in a while.  I wouldn't make a special trip for the machine though.
Pyscho. Roger Ebert got this right in his Great Movies review where the discussion of whether Norman Bates is a cross dresser transvestite because he mentally took the personality of his mother. It was included for the period of time when the movie came out. 
great t-shirt and got to wear it with pride. fav song?
I have never seen one unfortunately but my mom has. It would have been the early 80'. She was fetching the washing in off the line would of been after 9pm I think as it was dark. She says it was 3 houses down and maybe 30 foot in the air. I'm sure she said it was oval shaped with what she thought were windows changing from red to green. It was just hovering there no sound at all. It scared the life out of her and she ran and hid lol. She went back 5 mins later and it had gone. Whether it was little green men well I doubt it but its very strange
just over 4.00 to go ~20 ish miles (depending on car).
Their function is that they look good.  How can you not see the use in that? That's like saying there's no point in wearing button up shirts to job interviews vs baggy tshirts and unwashed sweatpants.
I thought that Alexi fly out was gone off the bat
Don't feel bad. The very first hole I played today (a par 5) both me and my partner shot 10's.
Here's the actual show:  http://unnaturalselectionshow.com/
I disagree with you very much so.  I think the entire movie is ridiculous and has about no redeeming qualities.  But to each his own.
Its 8 pm where normal people live. 
I see, thanks for replyin'!
Redick and Dudley are great chemistry guys who give the Clippers more stability and consistency in their starting lineup, and with not one, but two great coaches in Doc and Gentry I think their chemistry will only be better.
As are the people who bought drugs that this cartel manufactured, grew and or muled.
They are poisonous.
No. It's guy-dEn :P
I never understood why after my husband gets a haircut, they don't wipe him down or do anything at all, they just cut it and he leaves. He comes home with hair all in his ears and neck and face. Like wtf that should be part of the job to clean your mess.
I was expecting this to be the top comment. Chanticleer you gotta crow and you gotta crow now!
It's small a small molecule, is it a neurotransmitter?
OMG! THERE'S NOTHING SEXIER THAN A BOTTOMLESS WOMAN. I think I'm in love! 
Wow. You are literally the enemy of most redditors.
Thank you bew! And my user name is mewzers... hard to keep them straight.
I need: 452, 450, 440, 453, 456. 453 and 456 are railroads and I don't really know if I want to trade or set anything up online for those though. If you have any of the other pieces let me know!
Sweet little boy...sweet little boyohno it's ROOOGGGER!!!
I'll see what I can do. I've pretty much just been watching Breaking Bad all day, so we'll see how that greatness influences me. 
Well hi there *neigh*bor
Here is the problem, to buy a can tied to just one gun/upper, unless your state bans the ownership of SBR's, is insane to me. My 9mm can will go on any host I own, handguns and 9mm carbines. Same with my 22 Sparrow, and when my SDN-6 comes in, I'll be able to run it on a .308 bolt gun, 300 blk sbr, Scar 17 or even my 5.56 AR. The loss of flexibility by being cheap and "saving" $200 just doesn't make sense.
Thick in all the right places 
It amazes me that people don't see this. If you are educated and work in an office or something, your job is probably more enjoyable than working fast food or some other kind of customer service where you have to deal with people's shitty attitudes all day.
Shut the fuck up. - Me
Invincible, Sleeper, Incognito, Planetary, Strange Talent of Luther Strode, Powers. Some of those are not for kids (and some are published by companies owned by Marvel or DC). 
That would be awesome! 
Is it done Yuri? -No comrade premier, it has only begun.
Zebra F-301 for me. I carry a BP and a Bold at all times (general writing or signatures) and have always been happy with the feel and the quality of them.
&gt; I busted my ass to earn my two degrees  Did you? I "busted my ass" to earn my degrees, too, but only in the stupid whiny sense that students mean: I was never below the poverty line, I was never in any real danger of being made unemployed the next day, I didn't have a family to support, I never had to work nights just because if I didn't *I wouldn't be able to eat next week*. I didn't enjoy living off beans out of a can, but I could do so easily knowing that I was going somewhere. Anyone who's flipped burgers for fifteen years would have killed to be in my shoes, sitting in a cushy library reading books enduring an awful lot of fake stress about tests and deadlines and things that don't matter. What happens when you have a family to support, bills to pay and no social mobility?  &gt; I think that merits something.  I've had a fantastic education. That is many times its own reward. I loved it. People are jealous of me just for that. How could I possibly think that having been lucky in early life *entitles* me to being lucky in later life too? Now, I can't blame you if you went into education for the monetary benefits - you're in the majority (of students) there, and it's very sensible. But let's flip the situation around: do you really think that uneducated workers *don't merit* a liveable wage?  &gt; I disagree that professional chefs have it easier.  I never meant to imply that it was a *less skilled* job, just that it was a *less crappy* job. A professional chef might have job satisfaction, whereas a fast food worker might go home at the end of the day covered in grease and cry about where their life is(n't) heading. If you're a chef, you're employable and respected; if you're a fast food worker, you're throwaway and deemed worthless. If you're a chef, you get your own kitchen; if you're a fast food worker you're lumped working with spotty incompetent 16-year-olds forever.  Even if the wages are pathetic, the chef has the easier life. Not just in work, either: imagine you're looking for a girlfriend/boyfriend or trying to make new friends. Do you command more respect as a chef, or a burger flipper?
Ender Wiggins vs. Master Chief.
We're talking about brunettes not fighter jets
He's no anti-dentite.
You did that all in one day? Dang.
Yea it was. Martinez was back with Dante and Schweini was lone mid. They looked better today. Robben has been impressive this preseason in my opinion (terms of being a leader and not being as selfish).
The LiveMeme Transcription:   My boyfriend and I just broke up.   **Sophisticated Cat** &gt;* I SHOULD BUY A VIBERATOR. ^This ^message ^is ^not ^guaranteed ^to ^be ^correct. ^| ^[FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/LiveMeme_Transcriber/comments/1gwia2/livememe_transcriber_faq/) ^| ^[Mistranscribed?](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=LiveMeme_Transcriber&amp;subject=Mistranscribed%20Meme!&amp;message=You%20done%20goofed%20at%20http://redd.it/1jgh1f)
/r/scarybilbo  I just don't understand. *Why*
Should I do 33 instead?
Hi - mod here - please do a verification post before posting more  http://www.reddit.com/r/gonewild/comments/jji56/new_for_gonewild_verification/ 
It's weird (because they absolutely are objectively overpriced when it comes to their utility &amp; quality as headphones) but it's not totally crazy if you just look at it as a "fashion thing". A fresh pair of J's probably isn't gonna be the most comfortable or long-lasting shoe you can buy or provide optimal arch-support or whatever, but that's not the reason people are wearing them.  People wear them because they're cool.
can't wait chano.
"I was dead at the time"
Me too! Can't believe how time flies.
I realized I've read a good book when I'm pissed off because it ended.
...Yeezus
Shit's broke, yo.
AWESOME! I love killing defenseless animals!
That's anti Semitic.
Pensive.
really? its not that hard to figure it out. Weed is harmless and everybody knows that.
It's sounds spiteful, and if that's the case I'd recommend taking her to court. A wedding is a big deal and I think both daughters have a right to attend. If one of the moms is keeping her from it for such a trivial reason, you can have it mandated.  
My understanding (Jason Burt on the radio earlier) actually is that Ancelotti's #1 target when joining RM was Gareth Bale. He wanted him even after RM sent Spurs a letter that said they wouldn't pursue him until next season. So, unfortunately, this starts with Ancelotti!
He doesn't show that he cares.  I doubt he even listens to me when I tell him where I'm going.
Nah he didnt, it was Emerge who did the dab and he regularly drops like 1-2 gram BHOmbs, an they just use a highly educated nail or a dab essentials and both brands retain heat pretty well.
Why isn't this in lady boners?
The Civ4 soundtrack is good for *anything*.
nothing more than a criminal government trying to cover its tracks
The ball hitting off the top of the wall and coming back into play is like as if it had hit off the front of the wall.
I agree, and it seems like there are way fewer kills too. 
Banaorexia Mimosa?
Drawing on your own face is so hard. D:  [Here](http://imgur.com/a/HKijk) is my look, inspired by Japanese [cherry](https://encrypted-tbn3.gstatic.com/images?q=tbn:ANd9GcRmYw0wnerjCFg8ESCaxAa-ybseazdSTntA_-RVwL1sdWCgZmom2Q) [blossoms](http://images6.fanpop.com/image/photos/34600000/Pink-Cherry-Blossom-flowers-34658281-1200-803.jpg). My minor in college is Japanese, so of course I want to go to Japan!  Thanks for hosting such a fun contest!
[DIMMY WAYWES](http://29.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_ltydb5S4Pj1qhh7tbo1_500.jpg)
http://hooplaha.com/reddit-changes-harsh-reality-of-african-orphanage-for-the-better/  There's a link to the update on that one.  80,000 donated. 
 This link appears to have been removed from /r/worldnews by either the spam filter or moderators.  ---  [Despite a national shortage, celebs are using nutritional drugs that premature infants need for survival.](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/1jfv2t/despite_a_national_shortage_celebs_are_using/)  submitted 4 hours ago by: [Intermeister](/user/Intermeister) to [worldnews](/r/worldnews)  ---  **[Confirm it's missing](/r/worldnews/search?q="Despite%20a%20national%20shortage%2C%20celebs%20are%20using%20nutritional%20drugs%20that%20premature%20infants%20need%20for%20survival."&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on)** | **[Message the moderators about this removal](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/worldnews&amp;subject=Why%20was%20this%20removed%20from%20/r/worldnews%3F%3A%20Despite%20a%20national%20shortage%2C%20celebs%20are%20using%20nutritional%20drugs%20that%20premature%20infants%20need%20for%20survival.&amp;message=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/1jfv2t/despite_a_national_shortage_celebs_are_using/)** | **[Post to PoliticalModeration](/r/PoliticalModeration/submit?title=/r/worldnews%20%5Bremoved%5D%20Despite%20a%20national%20shortage%2C%20celebs%20are%20using%20nutritional%20drugs%20that%20premature%20infants%20need%20for%20survival.&amp;url=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/1jfv2t/despite_a_national_shortage_celebs_are_using/)**   |     |  | |     |  | ------------|-----|-|-----------|-----| created: |  July 31, 2013 7:14 p.m. | |score:  |  0 | first seen: |  July 31, 2013 7:12 p.m. | |upvotes:   |  4 | last seen:  |  July 31, 2013 11:23 p.m. | |downvotes: |  5 | missing: |  July 31, 2013 11:58 p.m. | |comments:  |  2 |
So.. Carb cleaner spray or clean the carbs manually?   Getting the carbs off a virago is a massive pain in the ass, as its part of the frame.
It's not porn, silly, it's a scaly Magikarp XD with a bikini I found it amusing XD.
Every country that uses the USD or pegs their currency to it.
Try a hair removing cream.  Be sure to patch test first and keep it away from the very sensitive bits (it burns a bit).
You're just jealous of her success.  Edit: I think you're right as to why she said something at that moment but I just watched the video and her comments about not looking at men and women differently were actually valid and expressed appropriate sentiment. I know you didn't say anything to the contrary but yeah. I hope Ronda slaps her around and tests her love of the sport.
"Big" announcement: Some retarded MLG ladder.   What bullshit. 
6 please! 
very chill. listened to the whole thing. thanks!
I don't see the issue here. Morelix said McD's corp has a $8.5b operating profit and that it would cost $3b to double wages. The WSJ article takes apart McD's corporate v. franchise numbers and says McD's (franchisees) has a $69b franchisee &lt;i&gt;revenue&lt;/i&gt; which it then "condenses down" (with no explanation) to $8.5b &lt;i&gt;revenue&lt;/i&gt; to (i assume) McD's corp. Maybe I'm crazy, but that looks remarkably simiilar to what Morelix said 
bs, they just showed this stat and graph during the jays vs A's game and it did not have that blown up 10.5
non steam if that helps 
You need to try the waterpik - not quite as mindblowing, but you will still find religion.
Wow, the blatant military propaganda is in full force today. Gotta keep recruiting those naive teenagers to fight in bullshit wars, right? You spent all that money to get a degree and threw it all away? You could have done something useful in life instead of perpetuate the war machine. Intelligence, State Dept, politician, private sector ngo, etc.
3437-3565-2641. I'm on mobile, what is yours?
I know...   "Princess" isn't an insult because it's an attack on women. It's an attack on someone for being coddled and waited on. Someone with servants and enormous ball gowns. 
Princess Auto usually has Code Readers for $40. Cheaper than even one paid check/reset. It'll read out a standard code you can then google.  The bluetooth readers that someone recommended are great and stupid cheap, but then you have to wait for them to arrive from China.
Just one question chance, how was working with joey bada$$ on that Wendy n Becky track? and what do you think about the whole beast coast movement thing with Underachievers and Flatbush Zombies
I just looked at the bike... where else would I mount them?  comiscGrrrl's suggestion below mount in the exact same spot.
Real men eat Quichenick?
I've heard enough people say that Tarte's Amazonian clay formula breaks them out like crazy to have effectively scared me away from buying it. I've been wanting to try their cheek stain, though - I've swatched it a couple times and it seems okay. Has anyone with sensitive-ish skin had issues with that one?
Western countries are a lot like ex-smokers. They decry other nations for being so backward and ignorant for having beliefs that they themselves had only 50 years ago.  OMG Saudi Arabia doesn't even let women vote! Well neither did the rest of the world less than 100 years ago. 
Awesome/hilarious intro to help you out http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pX613U_DWzE
To be honest, since I invested in a nice dildo I use it almost every time. Going without it still feels good, and sometimes more intense, but then it takes sooooooooo long. I have stuff to do, you know.
Can i come :)
Who was he talking to, Darius Rucker? 
Waking up.
&gt; Two buildings later, a man falls at my feet, head bleeding, hand clutching a scrap of bread. I step around him, not noticing the stares I get from the people who are next to me.  So if they had Iphones at that time, they could film him being so careless to his fellow human being and post it all over, proving that the Jews or whatever he is are careless bastards, and just get rid of the context. You see how they are? That's what they do. You see?   "I don't need to see *any more than that*." Surely that is what all would say. Surely. Oh and have you see the scratches on the walls of the showers? They deface property, don't you know?
I want this to be an epic metal song. What a stark realization of what is happening. I loved it.
ATB: 9PM (till i come) and PPK: resurection were two of the oldest tracks I can remember falling in love with.  It all started when I was 9 or 10 (2003 I think) and we got a new school bus driver. He changed the radio station from our beloved pre-teen pop hits station to the local dance station. We were resistant at first, but I quickly fell in love. I've been a dance music nut ever since.   As well as I can remember, my musical taste has progressed thusly (a list in semi chronological order, earliest to now)  ATB - 9PM (till I come)  PPK - Resurection  IIO - Rapture , at the end  Motorcycle - as the rush comes  Alice Deejay - Better off alone  4 strings - Take me away  Milk inc. - Whisper  Then I started to find some weirder stuff, and loved it.   Trentemøller - Moan , take me into your skin  Wisp - Beadumaegen , Ealdgewyrht , loophole (This guy is still one of  my favorites, and his newer stuff is pretty technically fabulous)  I Monster - Heaven  DJ Shadow - midnight in a perfect world, building steam with a grain of salt  Portishead - Dummy (album)   I discovered massive attack at this point, and have loved them ever since  Massive Attack - Mezzanine (album)  Telepopmusik - Breathe  Röyksopp - Remind me  Basshunter - Dota, Boten Anna. (gotta have your Basshunter phase.)  The prodigy - Always outnumbered, never outgunned (album), Invaders must die! (album)  Nine Inch Nails - with teeth (album), Year zero (album), the downward spiral (album)   --- not really electronic music, but hey, it's influenced me along the way  Jeckyll &amp; Hyde - Free fall (I really liked this one, not sure why it stuck with me, but it did)  Wezz &amp; Fisher - Roll the drums  Ali Payami - Audio Driver  Discovered Deadmau5 at this point, and instantly fell in love. Discovered Boys Noize at about the same time too.   **COLLEGE HAPPENED**  Skrillex phase.  Fell out of the genre for a good portion of my first year at school due to many reasons, but my buddies convinced me to buy tickets to EDC in 2011, and good god, did that reignite my fire.  Aug 26 2011, nearly died in a car accident.  After recovering for a few months, I began to dig into all the mainstream dance music I had missed out on since going to EDC. Never looked back.  Found: Armin van Buuren, Wolfgang Gartner, Bassnecter, Bingo players, Dada Life, Above and Beyond, Afrojack, Infected Mushroom ect.  Learned that I loved most genres, but had a soft spot for trance.  Found Aly and Fila, BT, Markus Schulz, Ferry, Laidback Luke ect.   EDC 2012, not quite recovered from the car accident (went in a wheelchair, had a fucking blast)  Sorta burnt out on electro house after a while, and started getting into tech house, minimal, techno. (still love my trance though)  EDC 2013.  Found Carl Cox, Richie Hawtin, Digweed, UMEK, Chris Leibing ect.   And here we find ourselves at now. Hope you enjoyed my musical evolution story.
dump the fucker &gt;:(
Do you have an example of one from ebay?
That's just his face.
I would recommend doing sit-ups and press-ups, if you haven't started allready. Both have definitely help tighten up my chest and stomach.
How do you actually do this?  If you can't find anything that gives you a significant amount of pleasure, how can you possibly find meaning even with all the good intentions in the world?  Everybody says feel-good stuff like this, but nobody seems to have any idea how to actually do it.
That's my choice in weights, it is all in preference on the weight you choose. 153-champ 167-star 175-champ, I have more 175s coming in star and champ as well.
Canada
I use my turtle beach x12's for music and gaming on my pc now (they were originally for my Xbox) and the sound is amazing. I have volume and bass adjusters on the clip so I can pump up the bass to any song I listen to.
*Both* played one lockout season in that total before being signed to their second contracts.  The lockout was 2011-2012, and Curry signed his contract in the offseason afterwards.
"Facebook helps propagate the illusion that strangers give a shit about what you ate for dinner." 
It gives people something to do other than stay at home and look at porn. 
There are ways to update the law without harming authors who are currently able to keep their works in print for decades. One idea is that copyright law be updated so that long-term out-of-print works enter the public domain earlier, similar to trademark law's "use it or lose it." Another is a requirement that the publisher make an effort to contact the author for permission and that the author has a claim to back-royalties if he or she subsequently comes forward.
Sometimes.
Title seems like a bit of a spoiler...
If I'm on the road, I'll pack one of my small cooler bags. Inside is some cheese, salami, hard-boiled eggs, a container of low-fat yogurt, some bagged one-ounce servings of almonds, and a small salad with some shredded chicken. Just like packing a lunch.   For longer trips, the bigger cooler with more of the same inside. 
Is that...Mark Wahlberg?
They may have no right to privacy under the law, but the owner of the video has the right to blur whatever he wants to blur, assuming that owner isn't the Government.
Went from the dumbest place in the America to the smartest place in the America.
I think you meant to post this in a default subreddit.
I am only familiar with macs so if you are on a PC I can't really help you, but iMovie is a pretty good program and it is fairly inexpensive. You can do slow motion and speed the clip up, and there are many transitions you can use as well.  The one downside to it is you cannot do as much with titles.  
Anyone Help? Please
You're doing it wrong.  It has to go in the ear.
**[American Bandits\: Frank and Jesse James (2010) (V)](http://www.imdb.com/Title?American+Bandits%3A+Frank+and+Jesse+James+%282010%29+%28V%29)** [[USA:PG](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Motion_Picture_Association_of_America_film_rating_system#Ratings), Color, 1 h 28 min]  Western  Peter Fonda, Tim Abell, Jeffrey Combs, George Stults  Director: Fred Olen Ray; Writer: Fred Olen Ray  ----  **IMDb user rating:** &amp;#9733;&amp;#9733;&amp;#9733;&amp;#9733;&amp;#9734;&amp;#9734;&amp;#9734;&amp;#9734;&amp;#9734;&amp;#9734; 4.3/10 (266 votes) &gt; After Jesse James is wounded by a bullet to the chest, Frank James splits the gang up and plans a rendezvous in four days time. With U.S.-Marshall Kane in hot pursuit, and betrayal within the outlaw band, the stage is set for a blazing and climactic shootout in the deserted town of 'Gila Wells'.  ---- *I am a bot.* [Send me feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FMovieGuide&amp;subject=Re%3A%20http%3A%2F%2Fredd.it%2F1jgilj "Confidence: 0.94"). [Data sources and other information](/r/MovieGuide/w/about).
I literally passed my test today in NYC.
Dr. Kavorkian
Maybe it's active censorship, but maybe, bear with me here, that upvote button looks a lot scarier than it did yesterday.
My hatred of the r2d2 knows no bounds.   Give tank good armour all round  Give tank huge weak spot that can be hit from all round  I love the kv5 for its surprising manoeverability, high DPM (though low pen) and great ramming fun, but that weak spot... It's like wearing body armour with a hole where your heart is. 
I know you didn't mention him, but my favorite Marvel hero is Daredevil. Frank Miller's run is fantastic. You should start with Daredevil Visionaries - Frank Miller Volume Two and Volume Three as well as Daredevil: Born Again.
This! I'm currently reading it, and it is really good. I've done two tournaments so far (placed fourth and third), and before the matches I found myself saying to myself how much I hated it. Reading this book has given me a different mind set. I love Bjj and competing, so why tell myself this is something I don't want to do? As you said, the match is won or lost long before the clap of hands on the mat. 
You're not payed for the work you do minute to minute, but rather what you *can do* and the value of the skillset/knowledge you have.  Assembling hamburgers as fast as the orders come in does not require any special skillset, but is more physically demanding than the job of a nurse at a doctors office.
You are an angel from heaven. I am making this for dessert tonight!
I work administration. I'm not a cop. I obsessed hiring. And all police departments are paramilitary. Is this news to you...? 
http://www.cncrouterparts.com/
/r/audiojerk 
